This review is based upon their happy hour only 4:30 - 6:30pm and in my opinion it was as good as it gets. Literally they have an extensive cocktail menu and it was ONLY $5, crap you can't get that at Santana Row. At the same time, you can try all the drinks without having to worry about being overpriced good or bad. Their drinks were well liquored, my favorite was the blackberry something...Oh I must give super kudos to Jessica our waitress, she was AWESOME. Jessica truly knows how to take care of her customer......There were like 5 - 6 items on the hh menu when it comes to food. We ordered the Beef Carpaccio, some artichoke tempura, calamari, and a few of their pizza --- YES all $5. Everything was sooo good, I especially like their meat pizza. I forgot the name, but damn thin crust is the way to go! Just a side note, the calamari marinara sauce can use some flavor. I would definitely come back and great crowd for a Friday night.
The food is great, the the service is a little unusual. (Disclaimer:  I've been here twice in two days for the pizza, and having lived all last year in Manhattan, I learned a thing or two about pizza and I recommend it here.) Today I had a server who really seemed to know her stuff.  She was peppy, helpful, attentive, informative, and efficient.  Things were going well.  I knew my bill was going to be about $8.50 (pizza and beer during happy hour), but I probably would have tipped her another $6 or $7 on top because when the experience is great, I think the formula goes out the window. (Disclaimer:  The largest tip I've ever left was over 100% of the meal, at the Elephant Bar for an extremely accomplished waiter.) The check comes, $8.67.  I put in a $20.  When she comes to take it, with the $20 sticking out, she says, "would you like me to bring you change?"  I don't know if she just didn't realize how little I had ordered, or if this statement statistically yields some people who instinctively say "no" (e.g., people on dates) and it's a big pay day, but the established rule here is bring change without asking if the customer wants it. (Disclaimer:  If I was on a date, I would have said "no" without really thinking about it and then would have been pissed off the whole evening.) Then she brings me my change, and she's kept the coins.  Pet peeve, but with a small bill she's already tipped herself the first 5%.  Is it just me?  It's like my kid reaching into my wallet to get money on his birthday; he knows he'll get some cash, I know he'll get some cash, but the formality is appreciated. (Disclaimer:  I have no kids.  But if I did and he reached into my wallet like I was an ATM, I'd definitely taser him.) Then I look at the bills, two $5s and a $1.  Talk about a guilt trip!  So I'm either supposed to leave a measely $1 tip (what would my mother say!), or tip $5 on a $9 meal (which, given the change she already kept, would be a 61% tip). (Disclaimer:  The smallest tip I've ever left was 1 penny.  Every member of the staff was a complete jerk.  Later someone told me it was a theme restaurant where the staff is supposed to be rude.  Whoops.) I left the $1 and escaped before I had to look her in the eyes!  Note that I had already decided I would leave a greater than $5 tip, but, really, I did not appreciate being in that position.  The service was GREAT until money became involved.  Then it became like dealing with AT&T.  A few dollars here, a few dollars here, and then you're paying $178.11 for HBO. (Disclaimer:  My AT&T bill is $178.11 per month.)
The foods were good. The peppercini sauce pizza with sausage was delicious for $12.99. Filled me up. The vodka tomato sauce penne + bacon my bf got was very tasty, cheesy, orange, and flavorful, a little tiny on the portion. The service was great, the staff was attentive to us since we were such a large group. Minus one star for the foods taking too long to serve. We didn't want to eat until everybody had their dish, so we waited another 10-15min for the last 2 dishes to come out. When desserts came around, the waiters gave us a nice presentation using a fake/real dish display of each dessert. My bf and I shared the egg custard/yogurt with berries in a cup with sherbet in the middle. It was really good, only downside was that I was too full to enjoy it. What got me mad was the fact that there were bugs on the floor where I was siting at. It kept biting my ankle/foot. I didn't think it would swell up that much... but here I am 2 days later, my ankle/foot/half of leg is swollen and I can barely walk. I'm sitting in SFO waiting for my delayed flight to Costa Rica, but I'm more bummed about my swollen ankle/foot. Whatever bugs it was at that restaurant were disgusting.
I doubt I'll come here again. The only reason I came was because our company dinner party was being held here. There really wasn't anything special other than the unlimited cocktails. I ordered the salmon and I usually finish a salmon plate. Not this time. The steamed veggies it came with was excellent. However the salmon was dry and bland. I guess stick to what you know "should" be good at an Italian restaurant. Their pasta! Parking can be tough, but if you're lucky... you'll find parking in a nearby lot or street parking. Otherwise it's $10 for valet.
Came here for a company dinner last week. We had a room all to ourselves in the back. With as many people as we had, during cocktails there wasn't much standing room and it got stuffy fast. Luckily they turned on the air for us right away. We had some sausage skewer appetizers, along with veggie skewers and mushrooms caps filled with spinach. The waitstaff did a fairly decent job of keeping wine glasses filled and getting drinks from the bar for those who wanted something other than wine. For dinner, we had a Prix Fix menu with bruschetta, salad, choice of 3 entrees, and 2 desserts. The bruschetta was ok. The bread was a little too crunchy for my liking. (don't like it when I scratch the top of my mouth), but there was a good ratio of tomatoes and garlic. I say 3.5 stars. The salad was that. A salad. Not a bad salad. Not a great salad. A salad. 3 stars. For the entree I ordered the Salmon with seasonal veggies and roasted potatoes. The salmon was ok. Not too salty or over-spiced, but a little dry. The veggies were cooked perfectly as were the potatoes. 3 stars. For dessert, tiramisu. A huge freaking piece. It was ok. Really wet, but not too sweet. 3 stars. Nothing really stood out to me besides the amazing wine. The food was OK. Would I go back? Probably not, but I had an OK experience. And that's really all I have to say about that.
This is chain Italian at its most mediocre. Not bad enough to give it one star but barely better than Olive Garden in my opinion.
Bar service=unfriendly... Came to pick up my to go order (i was 10 mins early) and it wasn't ready, fine I was early... But they acted like they didn't even have the order, but then found it and said it would be ready in 20 min. Came back in 20 and they said "not ready". No apologies , nothing! Waited, and waited. Finally when I got the food it wasn't even accurate, and of course I didn't realize this until after I get back to the office and serve the principals their meal, ughhh. Late and wrong AND unfriendly, can't get worse than that. No comment on the food. 2 stars.... Only because the principals were ok with the taste d the food.
Meh (yes, I realize that's the two star description, but it's my review). This place is mediocre in every way--food, service, ambiance.
Breads are good, but not as broad selection as used to have. Lost the  fresh baked bread sticks long ago. The coffee on the ice cream is unbeatable finish.
Table side service is always the best.   Lot of romantic couples galore.
Food is okay. Service is good.  Nice semi-outdoor patio area.  Lasagna is the best thing on the menu.  We prefer the El Fornaio in Menlo Park. The fountain on the patio has been off / broken for a while.  :-(
I go to Il Fornaio about once a month. If you're on your own you can sit at the counter, watch the cooks, and often enjoy a chat with your neighbours. As a couple or group the service is good without being pushy. The food is good Italian/Californian cuisine, and every few weeks they feature different parts of Italy with a special menu. Good food, good value, friendly people and a great atmosphere. Hard to do better.
What. A. Downhill. Fall. No, not climb. Not crawl. But FALL. Il Fornaio is horrible now! What a disappointment! Taste: Bland. Greasy. The pastas were NOT good. The butternut squash ravioli isn't as good as it used to be. The shell pasta with sundried tomatoes was flavorless. Presentation: Sloppy. The raviolis were all different shaped, and everything was splattered everywhere. Geez. Price: $17 for 6 raviolis? No thanks. What a rip off for crap food I could probably reproduce with a frozen package from Trader Joe's. Service: Our server was nice, but I think he was new because he was particularly attentive and nervous. The maitre d'/hosts in the front of the restaurant were HORRENDOUSLY rude. They didn't acknowledge us (and there was no one else at the front of the restaurant, surprise surprise). They didn't look to see if any tables were empty, only saying "Maybe 15 min?" They never came to get us when we were waiting. We had to go up to them TWICE to ask to see if a table was ready, to which they replied "I think they're setting up? *insert eye roll* *continue chatting with the other hostess*." Excuse you, do your job you lazy douchebag. And at least look me in the eye when you're talking to me? Speed: So. Slow. It was 2.5 hours from start to finish in that place. What a waste of my life. So I give up on this place. Time to replace it with something better, please.
Pizza shrimp special goat cheese n tomatoes (The goat cheese and cherry tomatoes and pizza was good. but the shrimp addition was just a bit off) Turkey ravioli. (This was ok. I think they had it b/c of leftovers from Thanksgiving holiday. a bit dry. not the best ravioli i've had) Fresh bread. (Always a great standby. if the food isn't great, you can fill up on bread and oil and vinegar)
3.5 stars (the average was 3, so I opted for clicking 4 stars here) great place for a date, even... Read more 
Taste: 2 Value:N/a Cleanliness: 3 Atmosphere: 3 Wait time:4 Overall:2 1 being the worst, and 5 being the best First off Taste wasn't horrible, but rather than there was none at all, the calamari didn't have any flavor, also the brushcetta tasted like plain tomato's on a crispy piece of bread. the potato's that came with the steak was also bland. The steak I ordered rare and was still really chewy and had a lot of fat that kept getting stuck in my teeth. I found my self needing to put sale/ pepper on everything they had. The food wasn't bad where I had to spit it out, but it indeed need more flavor, just to plane. The atmosphere is great, it is more of a fancy high end restaurant with out the high end taste. I only had a chance to look at their menu and their prices seemed cheap, I think this place you get average quality of food but with the ambiance of a 4-5 star place, for not 4-5 price. The food is better than Denny's that is for sure, but not sure how much better. I couldn't put a number in for value as I came here for a company event and didn't pay, but by going off the menu it didn't seem worth it. Let me put it this way, if you want to change it up from your normal Denny's on a Friday night and be fancy there is where to go. Id say at this place is perfect for those of you ballin on a budget.
My fiance and I came here for dinner awhile ago.  I had been once, years ago, and remember not being terribly impressed with whatever pasta dish I ordered.  So I didn't have high hopes for our return visit, especially given the Yelp reviews.  We actually had a really enjoyable meal.   I had the veal scallopini ($23.99) ( http://www.yelp.com/biz_... ).  Veal is one of my favorite things if its done well, but it is often done badly.  This was outstanding!  It had a lightly creamy lemon-y sauce that was flavorful without overwhelming the meat.  Served on the sid were some excellent roasted potatoes.  It was one of the best veal dishes I've had in years.  My fiance really enjoyed his butternut squash ravioli ($16.99) ( http://www.yelp.com/biz_... ) as well.  The bread was below average for an Italian restaurant, but not terrible.  I do think the prices, especially for the pasta dishes, are higher than average for the area.  We definitely plan to return.
Perfect place for early Happy Hour dinner. Delicious cocktails and scrumptious pizza ($5.00!) you can beat it. Perfect place for people watching. Everyone was very friendly and gracious. They kindly put my cocktails in my favorite shape glass. Can't wait to try more interesting concoctions!
I went to this place because it is mentioned on the Steve Jobs biography, on the book he recommends it for being a good place. So, I thought...this is the place! BIG MISTAKE. Overall I got disappointed with Steve's lack of food expertise because this restaurant is not what I was expecting. Not at all. I've been to way better Italian restaurants. The pasta was tasting like..nothing. The food had no taste, no salt no nothing. My boyfriend ordered a pizza and it was bad, sweet and greasy. The tables for 2 are really small, we had to move to a bigger table to have more space. Overall I would say... good service. good bread. good wine. bad pasta. bad pizza. expensive.
This is the last time I'll come to this particular Il Fornaio. It used to be one of my favorite restaurants on the peninsula, but no more. We came here a few months ago, and had a really awful waiter, arrogant and rude. I complained bo the management, but never heard anything from them. Last week we gave Il Fornaio another chance, and took friends to dinner there. This time the service was merely incompetent and off-hand. The food is mediocre, so there's no reason to put up with this. There are other better restaurants. I see there are a lot of negative reviews of this Il Fornaio, which suggests that the management doesn't care. It's too bad.
Back in the day this was a 5 star joint, sadly declined to a formula chain restaurant, but still glimmers of goodness. As they increased the number of restaurants, the quality and "specialness" decreased. Now such a routine formula joint that it kinda spoils the feel, the good news is consistency. Maybe a good joint for the happy hour &  pizza, the pasta's and meat dishes NOT up to par.
HAPPY HOUR REVIEW ONLY. Finally! A DTPA HH worthy of competing against Pampas! I'd only been to Il Fornaio previously for dinner, which I wasn't super impressed with (3 stars at best). HH runs from 4:30-6:30pm, so not quite as nice hours as Pampas (5-7pm), but still more manageable than say 3-6pm. AMBIANCE: HH patrons are funneled off to the side bar and patio area, away from the main dining room. It's fairly noisy, but not as crowded as Pampas, and everyone is seated. SERVICE: Very friendly. Not always the easiest to flag down if you're sitting at a table outside, but still fairly prompt. FOOD: JF and I had two drinks each and shared an app and a pizza. Everything on the HH menu is $5-- wine, cocktails, apps and pizza. Beers are $3. - Pomegranita: Delicious! Also stronger than I expected... definitely quite a bit of tequila in this. - Sardenia Swizzle: Not as good as the pomegranita. Something about the flavors didn't quite do it for me. - Calamari: Really bland. Fairly crispy, but the lack of flavor was really disappointing. I'd skip this and stick with the pizzas. - Sausage pizza: A real winner. LOVE. So nommy-- savory sausage bits paired with mozzarella cheese and other wonderfulness, all on a perfect not-too-thin-not-too-thick crust. From first to last slice, the crust was never soggy. OVERALL: I'll definitely be back for the pizza and for the pomegranita! Will totally suggest Il Fornaio as an alternate HH spot to Pampas.
Tried the taste of Puglia or lack their of.  The Burrata di Andria was the only dish that had any taste thanks to the cheese which was not made by the chefs I assume.  The 'little ear' pasta was undercooked and very salty.  Mixed grilled seafood was just that.  No taste what so ever.  The ingredient wasn't high quality either.  2 stars for good service.
Good service and nice ambience though not particularly unique. I regret ordering the lasagna. It was overly meaty and really greasy. I felt yucky after eating it. I ordered the butternut squash soup as an appetizer and it was quite good.
$5 Happy Hours // $5 pizza - BIG pizza // $5 wine - decent wine // $5 carpaccio - delicious carpaccio with greens // outdoor seating // friendly service // This is where I started my night before the last Yelp event and it was perfect.  I'll be back for another Happy Hour! TIP:  There's a huge parking structure across the street!
Food: 3.5-Stars Service: 4-Stars Ambiance: n/a Presentation: n/a Worth the Money:  3.5-Stars Overall Evaluation:  3.5-Stars Takeout order for 30 people included the following items: Vegetarian Lasagna Penne Bolognese Chicken (Pollo Tuscano) House salad (Insalata Fornaio) Bread and Olive Oil. QUALITY OF FOOD: * * * ` The lasagna was creamy, rich, and perfectly cooked.  The servings stayed together and did not disassemble when served individually.  Although the lasagna kept form, the fork made quick work of serving multilayer bites.  The creamy cheese filler was very delicious and prompted discussion over whether it was made of whipped ricotta or thickened cream.  I had to go for a second serving... for research! Penne Bolognese was delicious but dry.  The penne was cooked well but the entree was served with minimal sauce.  Don't get me wrong, the meat sauce was delicious; however, there needs to be a bit more sauce and a bit more liquid.  I got the impression that the sauce was on the stove too long. Pollo Tuscano was delicious while hot; however, the juices began solidifying when cooled.  This was not so great as I ate the chicken last. Bread and Olive Oil was superb.  The oil had a mouthwatering fragrant and an appealing green hue.  My taste buds verified what my other senses perceived, robust olives!  The bread was a delicious chauffeur for the oil on its way to the back of my palate...  MMMMM! QUALITY OF SERVICE: * * * * For a take out order, the service was fantastic as they had hot platters ready the minute I arrived.  They also helped me load the platters into my car for safe delivery.  Thank you. AMBIANCE: N/A The restaurant had an elegant ambiance; however, I only stayed a few minutes. PRESENTATION OF FOOD: N/A I'll have to review the presentation when I take a table. WORTH THE MONEY: * * * ` Approximately $20 a plate was reasonable for the quality of food being served.  The plates weren't overly intricate so I believe it is worth the money but not a screaming deal. OVERVIEW: * * * ' My lasting impression: I want to revisit and bring a client.  Il Fornaio was delicious; however it ranks as #2 in the downtown Palo Alto Italian food scene.  There wasn't enough WOW factor to unseat Osteria as the best authentic restaurant in DT PA. According to yelp: 3 Stars = "A-OK." and 4-Star =  "Yay! I'm a fan."... I'm somewhere in between @ 3.5-stars
So I haven't actually been here for 3 years, but from what I can remember, this place was amazing!!  I used to come here a lot for family dinners and friends' birthdays... or just to hang out since some of my friends worked here. I had NO idea that this place was a chain restaurant, and actually just found this out recently.  They don't cook like a chain in my opinion!!  There's a great selection... I think I usually got the gnocchi??  Yum. The Il Fornaio in Palo Alto is beautiful because it's attached to the Garden Court Hotel I believe.  There's inside and patio seating, and sometimes I'll see brides getting there wedding pictures taken :) Just thinking about this place makes me want to come back here again!
It's the best power brunch setting period I have been to  Burlingame Palo Alto and SJ locations for breakfast and brunch and they are in the center of the Universe in the Power Breakfast Galaxy! Typical fare with the group is : Eggs Benedict always done perfect French Toast with mascarpone butter with the green apple juice Mac and Cheese they use pasta shells And the frittata always the house FAV
Ravioli in camicia: excellent. Lasagna: Delicious. Zabaglione: To die for.
It's a hotel restaurant. I came with a group of 10 for my friend's birthday, but my expectations weren't very high to begin with. It has the fancy restaurant air with an open kitchen, but not once did they refill our bread. While we waited for two appetizers for 30 minutes. CARPACIO AND A SALAD DOES NOT TAKE 30 MINUTES TO PREPARE!!!! I had some sort of vodka laced penne with bacon. Honestly, the menu makes everything sound so much better than they actually are. It just looked like penne cooked over al dente with tomato sauce and a few bacon crumbs. I could have made that dish in 8th grade, and you're charging me $14, COME ON!!!!! Terribly overpriced, but that's what you expect from a hotel restaurant. I'll even go as far to say this place sucks. LOL have fun with your fancy Italian, while I sadly eat at Cheesecake Factory, both cheaper and better. As a food buff, this makes me sad...
Expectations were way above reality. Bruschetta was bland and mushy. No garlic. Not inspired. Our Server was lack luster at best. He showed no interest or involvement in his job. He was preoccupied by the fauna at other tables while waiting on us. His timing for removal of completed plates was completely out of phase and showed a clear lack of involvement with our table.
This place deserves its 3 star rating. There isn't anything particularly amazing about the place nor is it an awful experience. AMBIANCE: We were seated outside in their patio area. It wasn't too loud and we could have an enjoyable conversation. The decor is simple but not tacky. FOOD: Nothing really stood out for me. Portion sizes are normal for "fine dining." Taste-wise, nothing really stood out for me. PRICE: Meh. Not the cheapest thing out there. Just average. SERVICE: Our waiter was pretty friendly and respectful. We got our food promptly and didn't have any complaints. THE BOTTOM LINE: This is a very short review but it's mainly because this place is average in my eyes. I wouldn't mind coming back here but it's not on the top of my list.
I remember the first time I heard about this place, more years ago than I'd like to admit.  A college friend had suggested a bunch of us go for lunch, and the group was more or less split between those who felt they would be under-dressed, and those who felt it wouldn't really be possible to be under-dressed.  This is a hotel restaurant, a restaurant which must be many things to many different people. Sure, they've got white tablecloths, a heavy front door, staff dressed in uniform and those really big wine glasses on the tables.  That's all a front as far as I can tell.  The food is hearty but not fancy, and the service is usually friendly but not overly attentive or formal.  They serve families, businessmen, couples, pretty well everybody.  The claim to offer a kids menu. We've been eating here once a month for something like a decade, pretty well the only restaurant where we could be considered to be regulars.  We eat out almost every day of the week, and could easily find a new restaurant every day for years.  So.  Why?  Why do we come back here every month? It's probably their regional menu - a different region for the first two weeks of every month.  These dishes are often a little more adventurous than the Caesar salad and steak, pasta or chicken on the regular menu.  We've had wonderful braised lamb shanks, tasty and spicy lobster spaghetti, stunning and simple grilled vegetable plates, and beautiful baked pastas over the years.  Honest good food, interesting and well prepared.  There are also Italian wine pairings available, and as always a bread basket with wonderful, crusty bread - some of the best restaurant bread I've had. Yes, it can be loud.  Yes, the tables can be small. Yes, they can be understaffed at times.  And yes - not *every* dish is a winner.  It's a big restaurant, a big menu, and a varied audience.  It's not really a date restaurant, and certainly not fine dining.  But it does some things very well, and the regional menu has kept us happily coming back for many years.
Medicore, generic Italian food. Caprese salad was pretty good, as was the bread. I had shell pasta with chicken, garlic, and broccoli and it was pretty bland. Overall, nothing to write home about, but it has a decent atmosphere and is good for large parties or business meetings.
Once again, I love the happy hour here. Their fanstatic pizzas, normally $12 to $15 are only $5. Issues: - Parking is tough, so get here before 5:30. - Ends at 6:00.  See note above.
Great happy hour.  Can't beat $5 pamitinis and pizzas!  Nice selection of strong cocktails to choose from.   One of the bartenders can do some magic so if you're bored with company at least you have mild entertainment ;)
Excellent italian food. Hadn't been here for a while but recently have been there on a couple of occasions. For some reason I had the idea that Il Fornaio was overrated, but I was definitely mistaken. The meat dishes are good, but I found the pasta dishes to be exceptional. The whole wheat pasta with light tomato and garlic sauce is delicious - not heavy handed, a great lighter pasta. Also tried a meat ravioli that was excellent, and the pasta bolognese is was very good as well. Haven't had the pizza, but the thin crust looks tasty. Service is really good and friendly, and they mix good martinis at the bar if you are so inclined. Not sure of other locations, but a really good italian place, one of, if not my favorite in the area.
Our company uses this fine restaurant for our large client events. I am very impressed with how well organized, courteous and attentive their staff is. Their food is delicious and their service is top notch all the way down to their valet. They make each event we've held go extremely smoothly and helpful when I've had to cart all my event belongings out to my car. I would not hesitate to recommend this place to anyone. I simply love their stuffed mushrooms and their eggplant roll ups! Our guesst also enjoyed their pizza!
This was my first time at the Palo Alto location. I've been to the one in downtown San Jose, Marin, and Roseville...and this one is my favorite location. It has a nice outdoor area too. We went here to take my mom out for Mother's Day and we were really impressed. Our server was extremely attentive and on point. The food, was also really good. We ordered the beef carpaccio, fried calamari, and insalada del fornaio. All the appetizers were very well done, and I was impressed especially by their il fornaio specialty salad. I loved the house vinaigrette and shaved parmesan they used on the salad. My dad ordered the veal with sliced artichokes and lemon with yukon potatoes, which he loved. My mom enjoyed her beef tenderloin with balsamic vinegar and green peppercorn sauce. I really like the pizza cristina which had mushrooms, mozzarella, prosciutto, and wild arugula. If you want to go to a fancy, classy italian restaurant for special occasions, I definitely recommend this location of Il Fornaio.
Service (waiter) and hostess were amazing. Veal Scallopini was tough and the accompanying vegetable (green beans) were mush. Pasta Pomodoro had way too much sliced garlic. And the garlic was raw / bitter. Still raw after reheating the leftovers at home. The whole fish - baked or grilled - was super good. Great atmosphere and a solid wines by the glass program. Free parking is also huge and given the restaurant's location, easy to find.
This was my second time going back to this location The first time I would have given it 2 stars, as it is pricy and I had had better italian food at various places. This time I decided on the Pennoli Ala Vodka. Even though I ordered the regular sized dinner portion, when it arrived I was shocked by how little food was on the plate for $18. However, after the first bite, I realized that the bacon mixed with the vodka sauce made this a tasty treat. In fact, I found myself full at the end of the meal. Our waiter was attentive and quick to respond to us, and I am slowly starting to become more of a believer in Il Fornaio.
This place is quite a mixed bag. The food overall i think is pretty good. I ordered the grilled seafood and beef carpaccio as the appetizers and they were some of the tastier versions i've had in any Italian place and the presentation was clean. however the service was a lacking. And although the desserts were good...the state they were in on the dessert cart looked rather dismal. Its nice to have that image, but i'd rather not look at melting dessert...makes me not want them. Its a pretty good place, but it lacks the true finish of a place i'd recommend.  buuut they have many locations!
Perception is a magical thing. New Years morning us girls decide not to change out of our slinky dresses from the night before. Our perception: "If the dress is still on- the party is still going strong." and "My tiara has magical mojo and makes me feel like a pretty princess!" Staff at Il Fornaio's perception as evidenced by glares: "Walk of shame- more like a parade! Table for 8?? Okay were are going to give you a back corner where no one is within ten feet of you" When you are truly having a great time, it doesn't matter how people perceive you, or that its 8:30am. I was somehow bright eyed and bushy tailed- likely from the cup of joe and the best fresh squeezed strawberry mimosas I've had in years. But the menus we were given had me worried. Not only because they looked dated and unappealing, but the small selection of breakfast all had ham or bacon in it. (I've become aware that the further away you get from the city, the more vegetarian options are siphoned off). I ordered the french toast with some mascarpone cheese that thankfully turned a boring dish into creamy deliciousness. The energy at the table was jazzed up, ready to start a day of debauchery. The dress stayed on until the afternoon, and my tiara didn't leave my head until just before the stroke of midnight when I collapsed into bed. Happy New Year? Indeed it was. :-)
Food is good but portions can be very small sometimes. It was busy on that Friday for lunch so the service was fairly slow.
To me, dining experiences consist of two parts: food and service. Food always outweigh service because, after all, no one will be happy with good service but crappy food. However, before we put the yummy food into our mouth, the quality of service may sway our opinions on the restaurant. II Fornaio is such a place that leaves me an ambivalent feeling. Me and my friend came here for happy hour. I know we are a bargain chaser by coming here for $5 antipasta but the front desk people was "nice" enough to point out that happy hour ppl should go find a seat in the crowded bar area instead sitting in one of those tables reserved for dinner clients. She also pointed out there were outdoor seatings but no heating lamp was working. Yes, we ended up sitting in the patio in 50F sipping wine and eating antipasta. The food is tasty but the service definitely leaves a bad taste in my mouth. Our food server was great though, just the front desk people. My parting words are: I like this place and will come back if only people want to.
Though it is perhaps unfair, I view Il Fornaio as the Italian equivalent of Left Bank:  higher end chain-ey fare, high volume kitchen output, competent and consistent.  But not a blow-away gourmet experience. During dinner time on weekends (not sure if same is true on week nights) they have a table for 2 that they outfit with a gold tablecloth.  I don't know what the algorithm is for selecting you for that table but we've landed it twice, once in Palo Alto and once in Burlingame.  It was really a fun experience as they treat you to some items on the menu you might not otherwise try (like the butternut ravioli which they gave us an appetizer-sized portion of to try).  The manager came over and chatted us up and talked to us in a little more depth about what they are doing with the menu. Turned out to be a fun and special for us. I like the fact that they have half-sized or "primi" portions available for many of their pasta dishes, including the really solid tagliatelli bolognese entree. The patio area out back is a great place for either a little corporate group event or a relaxing family dinner on a Sunday afternoon. This location has a good bar area where you can also order from the dinner menu if you want something even more casual or fast.
We were here for breakfast and enjoyed a very decent meal. I was happy with my selection. The challenge was the service--SLOW. I chalked that up to being understaffed. I don't know if that is a regular occurrence, but that is one are that could use improvement. With all there other choices in the neighborhood, Il Fornaio would not be our first pick again.
This was the second time in my life that I returned food to the kitchen...it was that bad. The service was horrible from the beginning.  When we arrived the hostess said that she could seat our table of 2 in just a few minutes because they were clearing off a table.  We were the only couple waiting and were standing 5 feet in front of the hostess stand.  15 minutes later we approached the hostess.  She looked up and said, "Hi, have you been helped?"  Seriously? I reminded her that she told us she was getting our table together 15 minutes ago.  We were then immediately seated.  So irritating! Once we sat down, it took at least 15 minutes for our server to come to our table.  It was another 15 minutes before we received our water.  The service was incredibly SLOW!  My husband and I both decided to order bowls of the Lobster Bisque and split a Caesar salad.  We were not too hungry due to a late lunch.  We were really looking forward to a rich, thick, and creamy bisque because it was a chilly night and it sounded delicious on the menu.  When the "bisque" arrived, it was anything but.  We were presented with bowls of oily lobster broth.  It did not look appetizing but we tried it anyway.  We both had about 5 spoonfuls and decided that we could not go any further.  We are not complainers and we have never sent food back.  Our waiter came by to check on us and we let him know that the soup was not what we expected - he was very nice to take away the food and let us know that it would not be on our bill. Next we waited for our Caesar salad.  When it arrived, we were presented with soggy romaine lettuce with brown spots.  Clearly the lettuce was on the verge of being rotten.  I cannot believe that a restaurant would serve this kind of food.  We could have received fresh lettuce at McDonald's! We took a bite of the salad and it was terrible...the lettuce was bitter and the homemade Caesar dressing was terrible.  Our waiter wanted to buy us dessert on the house, but we did not want to taste another thing from that kitchen. The only thing that was good about this restaurant was the wine and the server who was courteous and professional.  I will never eat here again and do not recommend this place to anyone.
Although I've never been super-impressed by an Il Fornaio, I can honesty say that they stay amazingly consistent.  I went last week for lunch, I ordered the Pennoni alla Vodka and it was pretty solid! It was flat noodles in a tomato-vodka-creme sauce.  The sauce was fantastic!  The bread at the table is always warm and freshly baked.  I had a slice of the Pesto Chicken Pizza and it too was pretty good. I guess I can call it a "safe" spot for a good Italian meal, but there are many spots that I prefer if I'm making the decision of where to eat... The food is like the review, boring and hard to write. 3.5 stars.
Terrible. We had 10 guests and every meal was bad - over cooked meat and pastas, fish that smelled like bad fish. Pricey and disappointing.
I hang out for breakfast at Il Fornaio once a year, during our wedding anniversary (sans kids) at the Garden Court Hotel (which surrounds the restaurant). At least one morning I get up with the sun, let the wife sleep in, grab some reading material, claim a table downstairs at Il Fornaio (on the more casual cafe side), then set up camp.  The staff know what to do - they've seen this kind of extended campaign before. They keep the coffee cup full and hot, and they make occasional eye contact to ensure all is well. I proceed to drink good coffee, read, people watch, and most importantly, relax. Eventually I eat breakfast. Heaven. (I save a spot for the wife since she eventually joins me in this ritual. She knows where to find me.) On my recent visit I was pretty hungry, so I had the omelet with apple-smoked sausage, onions, potatoes and bacon.  A little rich for me, but delicious. Polenta square on the side was perfect. Morning vibe is great; service is professional, nearly impeccable. Cost can be a little pricey, but for one pastry, two full breakfasts, a bottomless cup of coffee, and two hours of bliss, $25 is worth it. Still a fan. Until next year.
I got the culinary beat down yesterday. First my lunch debacle and then this. If I wanted undercooked underseasoned pasta served on top of overcooked meat and coagulated cheese I would have had my 19 year old brother serve me his "top ramen with cut up hot dogs" college special. I wish Gordon Ramsay was in the kitchen telling the staff how worthless they are. Would have been well worth the price. Plus the waiter was kind of a dipshit. Archie: Do you have anything like Gemelli? Waiter: We only have pasta dishes in that section. Archie: Right, any like Gemelli pasta? Waiter: We just have noodles. Archie: Right on. Twins.
-- BAR REVIEW ONLY -- It's definitely not a pick-up place, but they make a damn good drink. We came in after eating elsewhere and sat next to an older gentlemen with a snifter of cognac, a delicate espresso and a half-completed crossword puzzle. It's like you stepped into an old-school, East Coast dive bar with hard-core drinkers and everyone knows your name -- but somehow you're at a hotel bar in Palo Alto. The bartender took obvious pride in his craft and required the same of his staff. I saw him notice a dusty shelf and within five minutes he and two others are removing the items, pulling down the precarious glass shelf, dusting and replacing. Seriously, that impresses me. Mr. Bartender sees something he wants to fix and does it. No questions, no dilly-dallying, no nothing! Alexei, the bartender (the other patrons referred to him by name), made an incredible Mojito and a delicious pomegranate martini. He even indulged us when we asked about making a Caipirinha (he confessed he didn't have cachaca, but would do his best) and then further indulged when we asked questions about unusual-looking liquor bottles on the shelf. When we left, we thanked Alexei and he said, "No problem, you'll be back." Somehow, I think he was right.
Great bread, mediocre everything else. Our waitress was older, red haired woman that messed up every order.
The second best thing to have at Il Fornaio is the thin-crust Marguerite pizza -- skip the pasta and protein entrees. Skip most desserts too, except maybe the zabaglione. The best thing to have here is friends, because without the distraction of their company you'll be wondering why you came here instead of Osteria. (Hey Yelp: Please allow half-star ratings. I'd like to rate this place a 3.5, because it's better than Fuki Sushi [a 3], and not as good as Caffe del Doge [a 4]. Whichever one I pick, it shows my bad judgment.)
I am about to eat my words.  I said I would not go back and I did, this time for a breakfast meeting.  Wow, what  a difference.  Very attentive service, delicious food, and a very relaxing morning atmosphere. Il Fornaio, I'm so glad you redeemed yourself.
How can a restaurant WITH SO MUCH POTENTIAL be such a colossal disappointment?  Fabulous location,... Read more 
I often forget about Il Fornaio given that it's a small chain and therefore pretty "mainstream."  But I've got to give it to them: these guys make a darn good breakfast. We came in for family brunch a couple weeks back and I was reminded how much I like their French Toast and Corned Beef Hash. I admittedly also fall for the open kitchen and wood burning oven that give this otherwise standard restaurant layout a warm and homey feel... almost like some of the places in Napa and ultimately Tuscany after which the decor is presumably themed. Il Fornaio is a standby business meal place -- so just prepared to sit next to aspiring entrepreneurs and venture capitalists talking with open laptops about the state of the enterprise software market.
For private dining only About a year ago, I asked Yelpers to recommend some places with private rooms that would be conducive to having a nice sales presentation lunch. Il Fornaio was one of the recommended places, and I would HIGHLY recommend it to anyone else. This location has just about everything you need for the type of lunch I held - easy to find location, consistent food, great staff.  My clients/guests had no problems finding the location, and there's great parking next door and across the street.  The food wasn't great - my salmon, veggies, and potatoes were swimming in oil and a bit bland - but it wasn't bad.  And the service!  Wowza!  Jesus was the service captain for my rooms, and from the moment I arrived, he was attentive to my and my guests needs/demands.  I think even my notoriously hard to please boss was happy with the pace and quality of the service.  They were so flexible and willing to help...they even were cool with numerous rearrangements of the room. So if you want to have an event and make it as effortless as possible...come here.
As soon as we sat down, I saw a kid run out of the restaurant (mom right behind him) with his hands over his mouth and proceeded to vomit over the white columns in front. This should have been a warning sign. Unfortunately I was dragged here again for a birthday dinner. I ordered two jack and cokes and the porterhouse steak. Service was super slow as always and the jacks didn't taste like they had any jack in them. The worst part was the porterhouse - yes it's large. So large that the veggies come on a separate plate. Too bad it's a large piece of tasteless meat. No seasoning at all, and when I asked (in desperation) for any type of steaksauce, the waitress replied "I don't think we have any of that." If you threw a live cow onto a grill and cut it up, it would taste just like the meat used. Potatoes on the side sucked too. Did I eat here on a day when the kitchen ran out of seasoning? I ate a few bites of the porterhouse and packed the rest for my dog. That's really what it was - $40 plate of dogfood. Waitress came around and asked how my food was, and I replied "Not good." This repeated itself a few times and in the end she decided to comp my dessert. Sort of weird logic, but I guess they're not willing to fix their mistakes. ALSO, I do not like the dessert cart. Did I accidentally come to a chinese joint? Waitress brought it over, left to do something else, another worker came and wheeled it away, and she ran after him and proceeded to bring it back. Only fools eat here. Dammit.
This place has really hit rock bottom. Used to be a great place to eat, now service and food are... Read more 
Excellent service from start to finish. Steve made reservations and upon arrival we were seated promptly. The wait staff was courteous and attentive (they hung up my coat for me). I had the pizza margherita and an iced tea. I was in need for thin crust pizza and got my fix- yum-oh! Steve had a vegetable and chicken dish. The overall experience was wonderful, good food and good service.  The ambiance is warm and inviting. Slight drawback is the noise level. Noelle's Notes: For a Saturday night date- reservations are the way to go!
So, because I'm probably "too nice" in general, I RARELY write a 1-star review on Yelp or Netflix or anywhere.... but today is the day I write one. I had a business lunch at Il Fornaio in Palo Alto and could not believe the food I received.  My counterpart ordered just a bowl of soup so to match his lunch, I ordered the Cesarina (translate: Caesar) salad for $7.75. How can I begin to describe how gross this salad was? The lettuce was brown, the hard-boiled egg had black around the yolk, the croutons were almost stale.  Hmph....I guess the parmesan cheese shreds were okay but doesn't parmesan cheese last about 5 years outside the fridge? I've had similarly bad experiences at this location and would recommend at least 20 places in Palo Alto over this one. Only plus - they seat quickly and have a semi-outdoor dining area.
Admittedly, Il Fornaio was my suggestion for a venue for my friends and I on the evening of my 21st birthday, largely because it's relatively inexpensive and none of us had tried it before. Whoops. After a tasteless caprese salad, we waited.  And waited.  We were starving, and the bread got quickly consumed - A+ to the wait staff for keeping it replenished.  One friend remarked that during the wait, our waitress refused to make eye contact with us, and would walk quickly past our table for fear of being accosted.  An hour and a half later, the food came. I thought the risotto would be a welcome treat, but instead, an uninspired, overcooked mush appeared.  My friends' dishes were no better; there was general shakage of heads and gnashing of teeth.  When the waitress asked how everything was,displaying a placating, nicotine-stained smile, we all laughed.  On the way out, my friends kept apologizing for bringing me here, and I felt guilty that I had suggested it.
I can't believe how disappointing this Valentine's Day dinner was. I booked Il Fornaio expecting a nice place - not nice nice like Clementines, Rubicon, or Ruth's Chris - but at least nicer than Cheesecake Factory. Il Fornaio was close to work and neither of us had been, so it seemed like a good Wednesday night dinner. I left thinking this place was like Olive Garden, without the 5 year olds screaming their heads off. The food was uninspiring and bland, and the service was incompetent. So example one of the incompetent service was when I ordered soup. The soup I ordered was called Fungo Ripieni (sp?), and it was pretty much mushroom soup. What I got had tomatoes and white beans in it, and to the best of my knowledge was minestrone. I called the waiter and asked what was up, and he said it was the right soup, and the mushrooms were mixed in. So I ate it, and nary a mushroom in site, and zero mushroom taste. IT WAS MINESTRONE! It wasn't even good minestrone! I paid 8 bucks for something I could have got out of a can at Safeway. It's like ordering a steak, getting chicken breast, bringing it to the attention to the waiter who says "that is steak". What are you supposed to do next? Example 2 involved the wine I ordered. I have no idea if the wine I ordered is the wine I drank, since my ability to distinguish wine is sadly less evolved as my ability to distinguish tomatoes from mushroom (jesus christ...). Normally when you order a glass of wine, the waiter brings you the wine in a glass, or, if the glasses are already on the table, you get a bottle pour. At Il Fornaio, the glasses are already on the table, and the waiter comes by with a normal cup and just pours it in a walks away. I don't know if that really conveys how weird that was. After tasting the food and experiencing the service, I'd pay at most $30 bucks for a dinner for two here. Needless to say, it costs a lot more than $30 and wasn't worth it.
Bad. First Impressions are very important and for me this was the worst first impression I have ever received at a restaurant. My boyfriend took me for lunch/brunch and it ended up not happening there because we LEFT-no service after 30 minutes but the table next to us who just sits down at our 20 minute marker gets service right away. I won't go back. I was excited too. go to Madison and 5th if you want good food in PA.
They have a great breakfast menu.  Good variety - with fresh juices!  Nice!
Absolutely revolting, disgustingly smelly  ladies room that smelled of vomit that has got to be vintage since it was out of this world.  As soon a I ran out of there I flagged down an employee and told her all about it.  An indifferent response is what I received. At the open kitchen, it should have been a red flag for me that not one Italian was on site. All the chefs were of Spanish decent.  Not that there's anything wrong with that, but this decision of going cheap really reflected on the food.  Bland boyond compare must have been how things translated from "tone it down" with the over-spicy.  It's not the chefs' fault, I think that mess was more management's fault.  For insrance, how can you f-up a salad?  Trow lettuce and cheese on a plate, dressing on top and charge $15 - still a bleeping disaster zone?  It was cut in small pieces, the lettuce, smothered with whitish goo.  Absolutely disgusting! The server couldn't care less about our expetience, even though we didn't bother eating 90% of our entrees. Tell me please, how can prodciutto be bland?  They managed to do that too.  After that disastrous meal, we were graced with an over $150 bill for 2 people.  2 appetizers, 2 entrees, 2 non-alcoholic drinks.  No dessert, we were tired of the torture.
This is one of the few chain restaurants that I actually look forward to visiting.  Although the concept did originate in Italy (imported to the USA by Williams-Sonoma), you'd be hard-pressed to find an Italian in the kitchen, but the food tastes good and the formula works. I have to give a big, fat shout-out to this location, which graciously welcomed our party of 12 when we walked in on Friday night after a holiday party.  We had no reservation, but were all starving and they (and every single restaurant in the area) were clearly getting ready to shut down.  They accommodated us with a smile, set up a big table, and served us our choice of pizza or pasta from the menu.  Our food came out perfectly cooked, and orchestrated to arrive at the same time.  Everyone from the server to the cooks to the bussing staff made sure that our experience was as good as if we had come it at 8pm with a reservation.  Thanks, guys! After a night of high-powered reveling, a steaming hot bowl of Capellini al Pomodoro hits the spot like nothing else.
Went here for brunch, and I'm stuck at 2.5ish I think a 3 would be pushing it.  The only good things about my experience there was the bread, our server, and the atmosphere. Well, let me rephrase that last one - The atmosphere would've been nice, except they sat us next to the open Kitchen and when my buddy sent back the plate because he didn't receive his meal the way he asked for it - the chef started complaining about it in front of us.  When it came back the 2nd time it still wasn't right - but the guy waiting on us was very nice and very helpful (he is the person lifting the average in this rating).   The restaurant is set up nice, but when we walked in it was very awkward, like no one wanted to seat us.   Overall my meal was good - I ordered poached eggs with potatoes and corn beef - but the price was not on par with the experience. My first hangover meal of 2010 was so-so... not a good start to my year.
We went here for breakfast and it was good. Very Italian flair but they easily made substitutions for our picky eater.  The price was decent for breakfast in the area... cheaper then Jefferies burgers, lol. As for service, they kept forgetting about us, but the charm made up for it.
What's to say?  It's Il Fornaio.  Just like all of the other ones that I've visited in San Jose and Burlingame, etc. Warm greetings and fast service.  They bring out water nice warm bread once you've sat down.  Good choices on the menu: soups, salads, pizzas, entrees (pastas, meat, seafood, vegetarian, etc.)  Majority of the people will find something they like.  You know what to expect when you come here for dinner.  Nothing mind blowing but it won't be bad either. I've been here many times for business lunch and it will continue to be on the rotation.  Why?  I hate surprises during lunch.  Surprises are reserved for dinner.  If I get a bad lunch, the rest of the day sucks.
HORRIBLE SERVICE.  Decent food. 1st visit - seated at Table 21 and warned that this is under the waiters' drop station.  Luckily no food/plates were dropped on us.  Pasta dish and gourmet pizza were great.  Service was ok. 2nd visit - Pizza appetizer, ordered WITHOUT peppers came out WITH peppers.  Told waiter who responded, "Shit!  I put it in the system wrong." Very classy!  Salad entree came out without a key ingredient, bacon.  Told waiter who lifted my fork, sifted through my salad with it, pointed to a walnut and said, "That's the bacon. The salad really doesn't come with a lot of bacon." NO ONE BUT ME SHOULD BE TOUCHING MY UTENSILS OR MY ENTREE UNTIL BOTH ARE BEING CLEARED. And don't tell me that walnuts are bacon!  I gave the waiter a piece of my mind, and got a side of bacon in return but still no apology.  I then gave the manager a piece of my mind; got an apology and a discount on our bill, but unfortunately it was too little too late and it still doesn't change the bad taste in my mouth. I do like their gourmet, thin-crust pizzas and would like to go back, but it will be a long while before I give them a second chance.
Just fine.  Hungry?  Starving?  Staying at the Garden Court and want room service?  You will actually be eating here. I have found the warm spinach salad to hit the spot. In fact, on my trips out here it is a standard.    It works for lunch, dinner, or both. I had the child sized mac -n- cheese last night.  It was a horrible day and I needed comfort food.  It was actually pretty good.  The serving size was more than reasonable for an adult- and it was extremely creamy. Granted this was room service- but it was pretty quick! I have eaten in this place- and the service has always been excellent.  Granted, I am not here that often- but I have never had a problem!
How have I not done a review for Il Fornaio yet? I go here all the time. The atmosphere is good, not too loud to have a quiet conversation. Fancy, but not overwhelmingly so. I love their food, the regional dishes are great! A lot better than many Italian places I've gone to! On their regular menu I would recommend the Risotto.
I understand a lot of people enjoy the Il Fornaio chain but  I just don't really understand the appeal.  Oh, and this review is for dinner for 7 on a Saturday night, with my boyfriend's family and their close family friends. We had a really brash, loud, kind of insulting waiter.  Made my boyfriend's mom feel kind of uncomfortable when she told him she didn't want sparkling water, had really bad timing (took forever to take our orders, then wanted us to be fast when placing our orders!).  It was just not a very relaxing time whenever he came 'round the table.  My boyfriend and I would get really tense and grasp hands under the table... if we mispronounced anything on the dessert menu, I thought he would hit us! For dinner, I had the butternut squash ravioli, secondi portion.  Which was still kind of small.  And oily.  And the fried sage was lackluster.  It was okay overall, I say 3.5 stars. My boyfriends 'pennoni alla vodka" was comparable to Chef Boyardee.  However, $16 worth of Chef Boyardee could feed a family of four for 2 dinners and this overcooked, underflavored small mess of pasta could barely feed half of my boyfriend.  1 star. My boyfriend's mom and sister each ordered the same dish, which I sampled, and it was okay: some orecchiette pasta with tomato sauce, broccoli and chicken in a decently sized portion.  3.5 stars. Dessert was very good though.  The chocolate rossina with the creme anglaise was very tasty and rich.   And the waiter was generous enough to fill up our water glasses each with a shot of water to wash it down with!  Nice! On the patio, I got a pretty good view of the wedding set up in the room across the way and it looked really beautiful... so there's that, I guess... I'd much rather try a non-chain on University Ave. than return to Il Fornaio.
Ugh, this place is TERRIBLE, and not just because it's the default 3rd date venue for every nervous college and high-school student in a 50-mile radius. While Il Fornaio definitely vibes "fancy restaurant" it does so without any real taste or sophistication - a rarely accomplished feat. The food is extremely mediocre and defaults to greasy. Obviously, it's also terribly overpriced. Not fun. Their only saving grace is their Russian bartender extraordinaire, Alexei (if he's still there). Alexei gets two stars.
I did not realize that this place was a mini-chain when I dined here as part of a Stanford night out. Now it all begins to make sense. The food seemed ... like I had eaten it before, perhaps in another life. Everything was expected: the olive oil and balsamic, the olives, the arugula, the tasting menu with prosciutto, salmon, chicken, etc. So it was like cafeteria food for grown-ups. The Naked Chef would not be pleased. To be perfectly honest, we enjoyed eating at an Olive Garden in Sioux Falls, SD more than at il Fornaio, even though obviously the food and decor were better here. Just not enough authenticity and je ne sais quoi. But maybe that's asking too much of a meal! I did leave satiated in stomach, if not in spirit. Try the Pasta Moon in Half Moon Bay instead. It's a much nicer location than downtown Palo Alto, in any case! The sunsets are better, too.
I've been there several times for business dinners over the years, but for the life of me, I can barely remember anything I've ever eaten there. This defines the place: a corporate rendition of Italian cuisine to touch on all the expectations one would have of a nice Italian restaurant without anything out of the ordinary or special.
Okay. I know it's a chain. However. The food is deLISH, and the service is excellent every time I go. Greeted nicely, the waiter was so peppy and informed, and fast, I mean, what else do you want from a place like this? Ravioli with grilled pears and a cream sauce - more like dessert than dinner - lovely!!!
Went to Il Fornaio for New Year's. Warned hubby to make reservation well in advance as "it will be packed".  It has been, in New Year's past. We got there and there were not one but FIVE empty tables in the main room that morphed into seven as we ate. I have never seen Il Fornaio this empty on a busy eat-out night, but we are in a recession, and I also haven't been to this particular Il Fornaio in the last 2 years. Minus 2 stars for weird atmosphere, to wit: At 11:30pm the place emptied out like there was a free money giveaway at the BofA. Only three tables remained occupied. Population went from the mandatory Lonely Guy At The End Of The Bar and about eleven full tables, to five people (plus myself & The Bear) who moved in close to midnight. Three of the five others were off-duty employees or friends of the owner, so ya gotta wonder. We only moved over to the bar as we didn't want to hit traffic until the drunken midnight melee had died down. What drunken midnight melee? The streets of Palo Alto were creepily deserted. I've never, ever seen this kind of resounding e - - - m - - - p - - - t - - - y  in any Il Fornaio before. :::cue tumbleweed.....cue cricket, sotto voce...::: It was actually kind of creepy. FOOD REVIEW: We ordered a special, the Italian sausage with fried lentils which was very good, barring the fattiness of the sausage which for sausage is...well...par for the course. The lentil salad underneath the sausage was more than worth the price of admission. Freakin' excellent - I'd go again for that alone. His Caesar was better than my Insalata di Bietole (hey, I LIKE BEETS!) which is going some. The Bear had a passable linguine he liked, and I had the special sea bass with caramelized onions and figs in a nice syrupy syrah. Food of the gods, it was really, really good. The mashed potatoes were even good and I usually abhor restaurant mash. What was even better were the drinks - sort of. I almost never drink liquor, but given the festive occasion, ordered a Melontini. I was served an Appletini by a clueless older woman server who obviously didn't know the difference. Look, I know the difference, the taste was enough but a visual clue? That little slice of Granny Smith instead of slice of honeydew on the rim of the glass, lady. I tasted & said "this is an Appletini, not a Melontini" She tried for five minutes to convince me it was a Melontini. (ok, fine, nevermind)  Having said that, it was a damned good Appletini and made extra freaky strong. The Bear's usual cuba libre was similarly strongarmed into the glass. Really sorry they've given up the double-dutch creme brulee with a light fennel infused vanilla custard on top of a thin chocolate layer below. IMO, it was their best dessert. And with all the other desserts but the sorbet containing flour/pastry, the gluten-free cannot partake. Were vended 2 comp glasses of cheap champage and after a lot of consutation between hostess and others, given party horns (gee, thanks!) at close to midnight. We left as soon as the ball hit the ground in the time-delayed-Times-Square replay, and ran right into a gaggle of cops in front of the place, questioning the owner about a suspected robbery by one of the staff. Great way to end the evening. I mean, do you really NEED five cops to take a report? (must really have been a slow night in ol' PA) You couldn't have taken it into the office or out back, boys?  Cre--e--ee-py. Don't know if this is economic crunch affecting people's spending habits, if the B crew was on staff that night (probably) or just a sign of where this formerly-fine restaurant is going. Will revisit sometime in next year and update.
I've been to three Il Fornaio locations: Palo Alto, San Jose and Del Mar (San Diego). Each location took on a different, homey but upscale aesthetic than the other. All three that I've been to were in good downtown locations. I've never ordered anything but the lobster ravioli, which I love. The wait staff at all three locations were excellent - always ready with another wine recommendation or question. I hesitate giving 5 stars because, for some reason, my friends unanimously agreed that their food was horrible (in Del Mar). *Shrug. I don't care. Just don't touch my lobster ravioli.
Wow, what happened?!  We used to have a Thursday night ritual of drinks and food for years on end at IF PA. It was fun then but now, not so much.  On a recent weekend evening, friends took friends out for a nice birthday meal. Food was nice, maybe even tasty.  But the service was dreadful including a spilled oil and vinegar plate which the server decided to cover up with a napkin instead of changing to a clean tablecloth. We guessed there must have been rationing of tablecloths. I had to flag down the waiter for any service. Now for the good news, had lunch at the Il Fornaio in San Jose last week. And the server was outstanding and the food really wonderful. Go to San Jose for a nice IF experience.
I'm not so sure! I just had a cage match between Il Fornaio in Palo Alto versus Pedros Cantina in Los Gatos. Wednesday night dinner for three at Il Fornaio. People dressed nicely, several tables of men looking like they're in talks about trading and trafficking women. A table on the patio was very lovely, bread and oil vinegar very tasty. 2 glasses of white wine ordered and brought by transferable carafe which I thought at the time was genius (because of the tall wine glasses that probably cost them a few profits when they often broke--my speculation on this type of wine service.) The wine was on the warm side and this was noticed more when the third glass was ordered and sipped from. The third glass was very tasty and the proper temperature made all the difference in the world. (At $8.50 each glass=$25.50 for the 3 glasses and maybe, a 2.5 oz pour in each, maybe. It should at least be at the proper temperature) The temperature was discreetly mentioned to the waiter. He apologized, but did mention that some people prefer their white wine warm because they get more flavor from it--so more of a you're an idiot and an excuse than an apology. Hello! I was pointing out that I am not one of those people and don't try to infer that there's something wrong with me! I was hoping for him to remove said glasses of warm wine and return with some properly chilled wine! Or at least offer! We did end up ordering a bottle of the same because no properly chilled replacement glasses of wine nor compensational glasses were provided! He pointed out that he would get a wine chiller for our bottle because he was doing us a favor. Enough about the wine. I had the beet salad with shaved parm over arrugula--yummy! Very nicely done! For dinner I had chicken cannelloni that was described on the menu wonderfully, however was flat, not impressed at all! I did have to wait for at least 5 minutes and had to call over to the waiter who never checked back to ask for some fresh grated cheese--I did observe these hunks of cheese being dragged around the dining room to be grated table side for other peoples plates. Oh, after cheesing me, he let me know without my asking that the bus person really should have been over to cheese me. I was really disappointed in the flavor, even going as far as saying that Pasta Pomodoro is far superior! I had the displeasure of tasting the HA Lobster Risotto. Ha! is for the lobster I don't believe was in there. Ha! is for the flavor that was nonexistent. And Ha! is for the quality of the cooked risotto itself! Risotto is a delight don't offer it if you can't prepare it! The food was eaten more out of sheer hunger than enjoyment! Dessert I tried was a double layered Chocolate topped Vanilla bottomed Creme Brulee--was very creamy and delicious. The company at the table was superb and that means excellent! I didn't pay the tab, so I don't know if the warm wine was comped as in complimentary, but I doubt it. After all I hear some people prefer it that way! Side note: Be careful, the walls do appear to have ears! My complete review, comparison, and commentary can be read at: http://www.irasciblechef... Buon appetito! --irascibleChef
If you like chain restaurants that have good food but horrible service, than this is your spot. My husband and I have dined here twice and will never go back. Experience #1: booked the small private room in the back for a special event.  After several emails with the event planner and a signed contract, my party of 7 adults and 3 kids arrived on a Friday night to a busy restaurant that was unprepared for us. The reservation never made it to their system; thankfully the room was empty, we were seated in about 15 minutes (15 minutes after we were schedule to have our pre-set appetizer which arrived much later). The service ended up being okay because they were desperately trying to correct their horrible mistake, and the food was good.  We ended up not having to meet our F&B minimum and were given a bottle of wine to take home. Experience #2: dinner with my husband using the $75 certificate sent to us by management as an apology for their mistake.  Our server was not focused on us as a server who cares about his customers and his tip should be.  He didn't note down our appetizer order so we had to re-order it. The food was good, but the service and ambiance just aren't worth the prices. One more thing to note, the women's bathroom was in complete disarray. The handicap stall was out of toilet paper and there were various paper products all over the floor. They do have a baby changing station but I didn't check it out, I'm sure it was dirty and unsanitary.
The food has never ONCE been good. My most vivid memory of El Fornaio is having rabbit that was so spicy it burned my mouth in most unpleasant ways, and had the consistency of canned camping meat! Slightly redeems itself by having good coffee until midnight.
Very, very, very impressed with this restaurant. Came here on a Weds. night. I've been to the one in Vegas, which is a totally different experience since it is inside the NYNY casino.  Our waiter was Alvaro, extremely friendly, attentive, and personable.  We ordered the flatbread and grilled seafood appts. The flatbread was very good, not too heavy and the dough was done just right.  The grilled seafood was perfectly cooked, had so much flavor, and was very fresh. We also shared the house salad w/ romaine, avocado and beans. This was just ok, wasn't much flavor though the presentation was very nice.  Then we ordered the double breast chicken entree to share.  The chicken was very moist and tasty, potatoes were cooked nicely though there weren't too many, spinach was nothing remarkable but still good. We were too stuffed from the bread, food, and wine to order dessert but I did get two butter cookies from their bakery to go. The restaurant is huge and they have a great patio for warm nights. The staff was very attentive (our water glass was never half full) and helpful recommending items.  I love that they have an open kitchen and there is plenty of bar style seating so you can watch the chefs work their magic.  This adds a nice ambiance to the place.  It was a great dining experience at a decent price. I can't wait to enjoy another meal here !
My husband and I had dinner here Monday night with another couple and it was AWFUL!  Our waitress was very abrupt and not well trained.  The fried calamari were not cooked well, but were soft in the middle with the batter not quite done.  My Caesar salad was limp and had no flavor at all.  One member of our party ordered the Caprese salad.  Presentation was good, but the tomatoes were not sweet.  When she told the waitress that they were not sweet, the waitress responded, "Are they supposed to be?"  Really?!  I ordered the Risotto with shrimp, crab and tomatoes.  The fist wasn't fresh, and it had an acerbic taste to it.  I didn't finish it.  Another member of our party ordered the swordfish which was overcooked.  Another member ordered the Lasagna.  The meat sprinkled on the top was burnt, which permeated throughout the entire dish.  Someone wasn't paying attention.  After the bill was paid the waitress was looking for the receipt and when my husband asked her if she would like it she responded by saying "Yes, I need it," and proceeded to grab it out of his hand.  She was not welcoming or friendly throughout our entire meal beginning from when we were seated.  This really set the tone for a miserable dining experience.  I definitely will not be returning.
I would like to rate Il Fornaio in Palo Alto higher, but in all honestly I simply cannot. It is a complete hit or miss with this place. I went there the other night and had a lovely time, only because we got a new waitress who was kind and attentive. For the price there is certainly better food out there. For some reason it has become a default for us. I have often felt as if there is a pervasive atmosphere of, "Buona Sera, aren't you fortunate to be dining here this evening!" Somewhat pompous in my opinion. The Burlingame location on the other hand is much nicer. I think the food is even a notch better there as well.
I'm so done with this place.  It's awful!  I've been to some nice Il Fornaio's.  I've even had a nice experiences at this place - brunch rocks.  But after my dinner on Saturday night I just can't handle it anymore.  The service was the worst ever, and constantly apologetic, forget the apologies, just do your job.  And my food was cold, nevermind the taste.  Except for the dessert, this was a complete waste of calories.  Here's what I ordered and what I thought. Polpettine al Granchio (crab cakes) - 2 out of 5 stars, I've had better out of the freezer case from the market Pennoni alla Vodka (penne in vodka sauce with bacon) - 0 out of 5 stars, this is one of my favorite dishes, but seriously I can make it better at home from a jar, try Rao's homemade and serve it warm people. Dessert, she called it "doppio" but I can't recall exactly what it was called, it was a big bowl of vanilla pudding topped with a dark chocolate mousse like pudding and then carmelized like creme brulee.   It was a delicious combination.  Too rich for such a large bowl.  4 out of 5 stars.
I like grabbing breakfast here on the weekends. The last few times has been great, not too busy, not too crazy. I usually get some type of egg omelette, or whatever special they have. Coffee keeps coming without much request. Their OJ is really good, so make sure you order a glass. I like the outside patio area, so ask to sit outside. They also have heating lamps that keep you quite toasty.
An A+ experience from start to finish. Wonderful service. We took our chances by walking in at 8pm on a Saturday and were immediately seated. I was extremely happy that this seemed like an "adult" restaurant... no sign of rowdy kids. I started with the butternut squash soup, which was also vegetarian! I never get to have most soups at restaurants, so this was a real treat for me. The bread and olive oil were fantastic. I had the special pizza which was goat cheese, mozzarella, goat cheese, spinach and mushrooms. The flavor combination was incredible especially paired with their delicious crust! My boyfriend had the Caesar salad and then the lasagna which he reported as really tasty with an "earthy" tone to it. The service was stellar from start to finish. The restaurant had a great romantic feel and we both left incredibly happy.
Yes, it looks charming and adorable from the outside.. but you'll realize that this restaurant operates like a chain restaurant under its cute Palo Alto facade.  Service is middle tier, and the food is bland, but you DO find huge portions for your buck (and the traveling businessmen who take advantage of the deals), particularly with the new prix fixe dinners highlighting different regions of Italy. Make sure you request a table in the front of the house, away from the neon lighting and failed attempt at a conservatory. Yawn.  The Il Fornaio in Burlingame or San Jose is 100x better. Dinner for 3 w/o wine = $124
Inconsistent.  I don't know why my experiences at San jose location always seems tastier.  Brunch here was lovely and good so I booked a few dinners which were...variable. Dinner with mom-she LOVED her seafood entree and the meal was good except for us being crammed into a teeny table, oh, and the dirty looking fork I was given. Dinner w friends tonight was OK. Service was excellent, lots of fresh bread and water, polite, checked in without hovering, put up with taking photos of us at our request etc.  My special risotto entree was OK, but it would have been WAy better if it were 50% less oily and less SALTy. bleah. Maybe that's to make me drink more??  3 friends ordered pizza and loved it to bits.  One friend ordered a ravioli and said it was bland. She asked for a side of red sauce and they cheerfully obliged, she was the only one who had no desire to take leftovers home. Wine was great. Decor and table was nice.  Parking lot near Borders is handy although it was full to overflow when I arrived.
Booked a private room last week for a business event for 25 - 30 people.  Attendees were doctors, so I was hoping the food would be at least decent -- I knew Il Fonaio wasn't going to blow everyone's socks off (I had realistic expectations). The Room -- very nice for a private event, quiet and secluded from the rest of the restaurant.  Although, I had to have them turn off the AC because it was so loud my speaker could not be heard with it on. OK --  Service (as far as attitude and professionalism is concerned) on the night of the event was great -- that's why I am giving 2 stars.  Although timing was very slow from entree to dessert -- I had to get a waiter's attention to clear plates as guests were getting antsy. Food --  apps were decent, wine was fine (i just ordered house wine for my guests).  However, Melon with prosciutto was salty and an overal weird combination. Entrees --  TERRIBLE just TERRIBLE.  How can you mess up new potatoes?  Well they did!  The were so over cooked to the point that they turned into raisin's -- disgusting, hard and chewy.  The New York Steak was just terrible -- not one of my guests ate the whole steak -- way under--seasoned, and an over horrible piece of meat.  Salmon was not good, and they chicken was overcooked and was presented so the legs were open in the air, not pretty. Dessery --Tiramisu was fine. Overall, I was really embarassed by the entrees that were served --   my guests were doctors and they are accustomed to getting good food at program dinner. Also, the banquet manager didn't even call me the next day to follow up on service and quality - needless to say, I was disappointed by that hence the reason I am writing this review. Do not have a large group dinner here, as it is obvious they can't maintain quality with large groups.
The actual restaurant is very pleasing to the eye. It's also fairly large (great for parties). Went here for a birthday party. The menu was already pre-selected. I ordered their grilled chicken breast with spinach and vegetables. The chicken was cooked perfectly. Very flavorful and juicy with great sauce. The dish was also pretty generous in size, especially with the chicken. For desert I had the tiramisu, which was just alright. I felt is was a little too moist for my liking.
We normally frequent the Burlingame location but an out of town aquaintence brought us here. Same good, tasty food as Burlingame.
I was hired to paint the faces of the employees at Il Fornaio Palo Alto for their Mardi Gras celebration.  One of the great perks was that I got to sit down for a FABULOUS meal when I was done. The waiter was very knowledgeable about the menu (it was clear that he had tasted everything and knew what was the best), and his recommendations were spot on.  Some of the best prepared salmon I've ever had... and the dessert "sampler" was to die for. Service all around was impeccable, and the exhibition kitchen is a very cool touch. There were even magicians and an Italian accordian player strolling from table to table! It was a magical dining experience.
We were promptly seated. Soon after we heard the tables in front and behind us complaining and returning dishes. Oh no, I knew this was gonna be bad. The food is mediocre. My boyfriend had the lobster raviolli which tasted like bad fish and milk sauce. Uggh. I really feel bad for the servers b/c people don't realize that the bad food is not their fault but the kitchens. I have a tummy ache now, so tums here I come. Try somewhere else. PS There was a baby cukaracha on the table. Don't believe me? I have a picture.
Il Fornaio, continues to have a nice ambiance and an attractive menu - pasta, pizza, salad, chicken, fish and beef along with kids menu and good beverages - wine, coffee and cocktails. The food however is average at best and service could be better.
This is purely a review of Il Fornaio's bar (because honestly what more are hotel "restaurants" for than drinking?)-- First things first-- the bright lighting sucks; the clientele is a mix of self-loathing tourists/parents visiting kids/bored business types; the bar area is uncomfortable and is more coffee shop than watering hole. So why go? Those drinks. And the bartenders who make them. I've been known to throw on a robe and sulk across the street to the Il Fornaio bar because of the innumerable awesome drinks. Cucumber gimlets; coffee-infused martinis. It's an extensive cocktail list, but if you don't see something that suits you, the bartender will accommodate. Don't like what he comes up with? It will be replaced- free of charge-- with something you'll like more. (Buyer be warned-- you'll drop $10ish a drink. But hey it's Palo Alto and these drinks aren't watered down.) Sometimes a girl finds herself stuck in the peninsula in need of a drink to help forget a rough day. Il Fornaio provides the drinks, doesn't expect anything but cash in return (i.e. post-gym 'tinis are AOK). That earns this spot four stars.
This place is awesome!  Once inside, you smell the bread baking and something roasting.  So soothing when it's raining outside.  I didn't really go there to eat-eat but snack on something and get some caffeine in me. I got the angel hair pasta after reading that all their pasta's are fresh.  Talk about delicious!  It was the perfect portion for my in-between [meals].  I also had a double espresso.  It did the trick of waking me up but damn, I couldn't sleep at night.  I was up until 5am thinking why the fuck did I get that double?  Beware, very strong. I'm surprised that this place wasn't rated higher.  The ambiance, drinks (full bar), and food are great!
I used to love this place, years ago.  Did it change, or me?  Anyway, on a recent visit, my memories were not shattered but certainly shaken up.  The food was good but not great, except for the bread which IS great.  Wine fair.  VERY BUSY, very noisy, service slow.  Perhaps they were not expecting such a crowd on a Monday?  Location is fantastic, just off a fun University Ave in Palo Alto. Other Italian restaurants on University Ave in Palo Alto or on Laurel St. in San Carlos are probably better bets.   Competition in this space is pretty fierce.
This restaurant has excellent Italian fare, with an additional menu that changes throughout the year focusing on specific regions of Italy.  Il Fornaio also is a recipient of a Wine Spectator Award of excellence, one of five in the downtown PA area. Adjacent to the Garden Court Hotel, Il Fornaio is one of the best Italian restaurants downtown, in my opinion, even though it is a chain of several restaurants mostly found in California.  Given the many nearby competitors in the Italian restaurant category, this should be seen as high praise.  The bar area is also excellent, and there is a 'garden' patio area that is covered, but feels like outdoor dining.  Il Fornaio offers a large range of pastas, meat entrees, fish, and pizza too. I think it is important to highlight the seasonal menu that focuses on different regions of Italy.  Many diners don't realize the differences that each region in Italy has contributed, and so I usually focus on the changing menu to refine my palate.  So, the gastronomic experience can be like a mini culinary educational tour of Italy itself.
I had a great beet salad there tonight with excellent service at the bar. The ahi tuna tartare had a nice sauce, but the fish wasn't the best quality. The appetizer platter, with many different antipasti, was uniformly awful -- including a soggy bruschetta, an unchewable pancetta wrapped around a yummy grilled scallop, crappy prosciutto on tasty melon, decent mozz on a tasteless tomato (caprese), and something like ratatouille in the center of the plate that wasn't on the menu (as far as I remember). Great breadsticks with poppy seeds and sesame seeds. I think the restaurant is nice. It's quite large but still feels like a trattoria. However, this is not a good choice for a romantic date. Don't forget to get the regional passport (free), which gets you a free gift if you order from the regional menu. I got some polenta today. There's a garage with free parking across the street.
Not really my kinda place, i mean it's stodgy and not at all funky. It's an american express kinda place and thankfully it didn't have my name on the back. But the food was actually pretty decent. The sea bass dish was an entire fish so it was big-ass and a good value at $27, not to mention delicious. I mean a whole fresh fish would run that much at a cantonese seafood restaurant where they have $5 lunch specials. We tried a few of the pastas and they were tasty but more or less equivalent to pasta pomodoro. The wine tasted good: we had a bottle of white and a bottle of red but  they didn't get me buzzed in a good way, they only made me sleepy, which is unusual. service was unobtrusive and somewhat dull. I dunno...3 stars if i round up?
Had reservations for a group lunch and a nice table out on the patio.  Service started off attentive, but as the patio filled up, it became less so. This place works when you need to accommodate different appetites, but probably wouldn't go here other than work lunches.
5 stars for the outside patio. 3.5 stars for the brunch menu 2.5 stars for the service I liked the outside heated patio and the water fountain. It's great on a warm day especially for brunch. I came to meet my two friends who live down in mountain view for brunch. The french toast, which a friend ordered was good. I completely forgot what my friend Roland ordered but they added raw uncooked red onions which apparently was gross. I had the special veggie omelette which was ok and the fruit salad seemed like it came from a mass-produced factory.  The olive oil and balsamic vinegar was ok. All in all, everything was ok, but if I drive back down to PA, i'd prob rather go somewhere else...
Il Fornaio is "fine".  Like when I'm shopping with my mom and she's trying stuff on and I really just don't care, I tell her she looks "fine". I did not like our waiter.  He was straight out of Grease, with his Brooklyn accent and slicked-back hair.  Service was slow, from taking our order to serving us food.  They have people to serve bread (delish, by the way) and water, why can't they have servers for the meal?  We sat by the half-wall partition, and the table on the other side of the partition sat 15 mins after us, had wine-appetizers-entrees-dessert, and left earlier than us. I got the soup of the day, three-bean soup.  It was good, but nothing to write home about.  For my entree I ordered the angel hair pasta.  When it got to me it looked like it had been sitting out for a bit, the sauce was sitting in the pasta in a way that looked it wasn't completely fresh.  It was tasty, though, helped out a lot by a big helping of garlic (I love garlic!).  I could see someone being off-put by the enormous chunks of garlic in this dish, though. All in all, I would not come back.  There are many better Italian restaurants in the area (Cafe Pro Bono!).
I went here for lunch and I got the salmon spinach salad. Salmon was well prepared and the warm vinaigrette  was delicious. The freshly baked OLIVE bread was delicious!!! There were olive pieces in the bread. Complaints: 1) Not enough mushroom and walnut in my salad 2) A little too much dressing Other than that, everything was great. Make sure to make reservation during peak times!
Like someone else stated, this place is hit or miss. On a 1 - 10 scale, 10 being the best: Carpaccio = 7 Rib-eye = 7 Lasagna = 5 (Chef Boyardee sauce) Crepes = 6 Sorbet = 7 Overpriced for what it is.
I cannot recommend this place as room service to the Garden Court Hotel, unless it's Valentine's Day and you don't really feel like getting out of bed. I think the food might have been nice if it hadn't been sitting around waiting to be delivered for 20 minutes, but as such the salad was wilted, the pizza was hard, and the pasta was chilly.  (On the other hand, the wine and minestrone were great.)  Even cold, it still tasted pretty good, but not $130 good.
This place is very good, and yes, it is a chain.  They have a decent bakery, which makes sense given the name, and some of the dishes are real winners although the service and kitchen can be somewhat inconsistent. The butternut squash ravioli with brown butter and fried sage is worth a try.
At $29 bucks, I would have expected the sea bass not to taste like overlooked trout. That being said, however, the specialty pizza was fantastic. We should have stopped there. A great environment nonetheless. And a venerable Palo Alto institution.
Wow...I wasn't expecting anything spectacular but wow...comparable to Olive Garden, and that's no compliment. Should not be regarded as a 'fancy' restaurant. It's actually pretty blandly decorated and the service is on par with, hmm, TGI Friday's, except they weren't nice at Il Fornaio. They actually had no good reason to be snooty; we were dressed well, we ordered plenty of food and drinks, and made no out-of-the-ordinary requests. And, sorry, but you should NOT pour wine like you pour tap water! W.T.F. Lame. Seriously. El cheapo Italian food. But I'd rather go to Buca for the same price and WAY better atmosphere. But even better, I'd rather just spend that same money on 'good food'. Il Fornaio sucks, plain and simple. ========== Oh, I should probably add that I lived in Italy (specifically in Tuscany) for awhile. This is not Italian food.
I remember coming here 4 years ago for my pre-interview dinner at "The Big House" and tonight it all came full circle. Same restaurant, even the same room. The food was overall decent, not quite as good as I remembered, and it certainly didn't blow me away. The bruschetta was ok, though the cheese was a little congealed. The salad was light and the ground pepper was a nice touch. I went with the salmon tonight, which was grilled pretty well - slightly crisp on the outside but still flavorful and moist on the inside. Vegetables (string beans and potatoes) were done well, but a touch oily. The highlight, however, was definitely the dessert. Chocolate mouse with raspberries. Decadent. Might come back on my own if a date was hungering for Italian in downtown PA, or maybe just for the dessert. I don't know how authentic it really is, but it's pretty good for downtown PA.
I really like the restaurant itself.  It is great for lunch, I have been here several times and it is never overly crowded and the shaded patio is great to get some fresh air and not get overheated by the sun. The food is good, they have a ton of pastas to choose from.  It seems like without fail I end up ordering one of their daily specials and am always happy. I wouldn't say the food blows me away, hence the three stars, but the ambiance and the service are both phenomenal and it will keep me coming back.
I really dislike this place, though I am not exactly able to figure out why. The food is OK, nothing that special. I am a sucker for fresh pasta, and I concede that they do that fairly well. I went recently and the service was terrible. Our waitress was very nice, but she seemed to have way to many tables to manage, and our water glasses were always empty, food came out at different times, and specifications went unnoticed. I also felt kind of bad because when we finished dinner, she wheeled the dessert cart over and was really selling the desserts hard. She insisted on extolling the virtues of each treat, only to be rejected by us because we were full. That made me feel like a bad person. The patio is pretty nice, but on the whole I find the atmosphere stuffy and pretentious. At the very least, however, it is better than that nearby craphole Osteria.
I've only been here for lunch and it is pricey, but since the boss is paying I can't complain.  Came here once for group lunch, and another time for a  candidate.  But, if I go here, it would be for dinner (when I would be more amenable to shelling out the bucks myself). Anyways, I can see why people come here for business lunch.   Service is at decent speed, you get free bread, and it feels classy. I had the calzoni.  It was HUGE.  The crust was well formed.  They put a lot of cheese in it (which I like) but they only offer it with ham.   Unfortunately the ham tasted very blase--I was torn between liking it or not. Service.  Well they seating was prompt and timely at lunch so maybe that's why it is popular with the business crowd.  Also, it looks rich enough so you can bring your clients or job candidates. However, I was afraid to take the doggie bag.  The waiter was clearing the dishes and making a huge pile and dropping our knives and forks near my remaining 1/2 calzoni.  I was afraid he was flicking stuff on it or may accidentally  mix the calzoni with the other crud....not a comforting feeling on food hygiene/handling.
Just okay... I wasn't too thrilled with it.  The service was decent and all (though a couple of times they took a good long time getting things to us...)  The food was decent... not bad, not great either for the $$$ price range.  The chicken breast was a bit overcooked on the sides and some of the food came a bit cooler than we liked.  (Then again, I prefer my food on the "warm to hot" side.) We didn't order dessert here, since it seems the party that we were part of choose this place b/c it was close to the Prolific Oven, where they got their cake.  (My comments is in a separate review...) I wouldn't go out of my way to come back again, but I will come back if I happen to be in the area... and someone else is paying!!!  :o)
I've eaten at other restaurants in this chain and always had a good experience, so expected the same here. We had a reservation and the restaurant was maybe 30% full, so we were surprised when we were seated by the kitchen, by the restrroom AND by the busboy's station.  Trying to test my patience when I'm hungry???  Not pleasant.  But we decided to try to ignore these things and see if we could have a tolerable experience anyway. The food and service were good, but the HORRIBLE seat, noise from the kitchen and bathroom definitely meant I had to subtract 2 stars. Why would ANY restaurant seat ANY customer at a bad table when other tables are available??? I don't know, but we won't return to THIS location as a result of this kind of stupidity. We also noted that other people were being seated in this area when there were other seats available in the nicer garden area.   Seems like an odd way to treat customers. I'll take my $60+ and head elsewhere for lunch.
Loved it!  Great food. Great service.
This place gets a bad rap. If you come go for Brunch on the weekend or lunch, but dinner is too expensive and such.
We ate here for lunch... It is overpriced, non authentic food. I just can't understand why we back here. I am all for giving places a second chance. Maybe we just had bad luck. The service was terrible. Will someone please explain to me why it is hard for someone to fill back up the water or bring out both entrees at the same time. Grrr... This review made me mad...
Food: 2 stars Service: 2 stars Ambiance: 4 stars Overall: 2.5 stars It's A-OK.  Went here for a large group bday dinner.  I got the Ravioli alla Lucana ($18!) which texture was ok (supposedly made on-site), but not much taste.  I don't even remember what the filling was.  Hubbie got the lasagna, which was kinda lame... only three thin layers and taste was under-whelming.  Pizza ($13.50) has soggy crust.  The Conchiglie al Pollo ($17) is better at Pasta Pomodoro. I have to admit their calamari ($10) was deliciously tender and their chocolate mousse dessert (Rosina al Cioccolato $7) was complex and good.  Friend's appetizer salad ($10) also looked like a good quantity and yummy. So hmm... maybe just go for appetizer and skip straight to dessert.  :D
Simple review Inspired by Aidan B, 'Holy Crapola, Batman'. Slow service and annoying food were the take home points from our recent meal.  I appreciated I-F's focus on different regions in Italy but it needs better follow through not Prego sauce with a fancy write up. The food might have improved had we ordered wine or spirits but the the service wouldn't.  Another disappointing 2 star experience.
It's a perfectly good restaurant that served up a nice enough shrimp and avocado omelette for my brunch.  I especially liked dining al fresco on the back patio. However, our waitress with the severe eye makeup was none too attentive and our waters remained unfilled throughout our brunch.
My ex-coworker really liked this place, so we came here for lunch one day. He recommended the lobster ravioli dish. Other than the small size (~4-5 Raviolis) there's not much else I didn't like about this dish. Aside from the obviously unhealthy factor (the thick sauce is very tasty, but I don't want to know what went in there =) Deco -- white table cloth type of establishment. Wait staff --friendly, as expected at these places food -- tasty value -- at ~$22-25 for 5 Ravioli pockets, it's up to you to decide if that's worth it.
Here's what I love Il Forniao for: languid late Sunday brunch. It's almost 3 PM and I'm finishing up the last of several great cups of coffee. I've just had the breakfast calzone: scrambled eggs, bacon, sausage, thinly sliced potatoes, onions, and cheese baked in a hot pastry the size of my head and served with a topping of Parmesaean cheese. In the background, Lena Horne is playing;  before that, it was Louis Armstrong's version of "Summertime". The mood  is languid and relaxed. My partner had the eggs/bacon/potatoes breakfast, with fruit instead of the potatoes -- again, a large plate of food.  To finish up, we're sharing a bowl of sorbet -- the strawberry is lovely and fresh tasting!.  Our waterglasses have been kept full, my coffee refilled -- the service prompt and friendly. And to top it all off? Free wifi. That's how I'm writing this review. :-) Sometimes we don't get here in time for brunch; the we share some appetizers and dessert. I've occasionally eaten here for dinner, but for me, the best time to be here is a Sunday about 2 PM, when the brunch crowd has mostly cleared out and the atmospher is relaxing and convivial.
They use fresh ingredients, they always have fresh bread baked in a brick oven at 5PM, and they keep their kitchen open late. This is a worthwhile place as a reliable stand-by for a lack of any other best option. I am not certain why some of the other people were rating this place if they do not like Italian food. This seems very strange to me. Their pizza is also made in the brick ovens, the rotisserie chicken is slightly mesquite smoked - but not too much. I have never received a plate that was over cooked or spoiled.
Simple but nice. Seafood pasta I had was so hot that I had to wait for a while to let it cool down.  "You have to run to serve Pasta."  This is one of the most important aspect of identifying good Italian restaurants.
The wife and me went to Il Fornaio for brunch today (Saturday 12:00). The place was at ~%50 occupancy but filled up by the time we left. Had eggs Benedict and eggs over easy, both very good, though the eggs were a tad on the greasy side. The bread basket placed on every table is great, freshly baked and diverse. Orange juice was wonderful! The espresso was great - a rare treat in these parts. Service was ok, fast, helpful and pleasent. The atmosphere was pleasant though busy. Women's toilets can do with some more attention. We will be coming back for weekend breakfasts / brunches.
Nice atmosphere. Good service. Delicious Italian food. Last night we had fried calamari, minestrone soup, Caesar salad, cannelloni, and lasagna. All of it was very good. They also make an especially good cup of coffee. We have also had brunch there and it too was good. It's kind of a place you can count on.
We thought this place is mediocre for italian food. The cannelloni with chicken was OK, the spinach ravioli was OK, the fried calamari was OK. For dessert we got the zabaglione, which was really runny and we didn't enjoy at all, and the assortment of ice cream, which had 3 flavors, two of them unrecognizable and a  little blah, and the other one dark chocolate, which was good but the smaller ball of all. The only thing we enjoyed was the bread. We also thought that our wine glasses could be much fuller. Overall didn't worth it for 93 dollars for 2 people. Osteria was much better, for 60 dollars per 2 people. Not coming back anytime soon.
Good mini chain with nice pasta's and fairly good pizza . OK prices. Lousy parking and a pain to get to.
I've been eating here for a long time, since my mom is especially fond of the restaurant. The atmosphere has always been nice, with the bar right next to the kitchen so you can watch the chefs make your food. I have eaten here for breakfast and dinner, and have to say that their breakfast menu is far better. They have a wide assortment of meals, my favorite being the smoked salmon with a cream cheese on toast. If they were closer to my house I might have the will to wake up earlier in order to eat there every day. I don't like the dinner menu nearly as much. They do have a lot of choices of pasta, and they also make pizza. If you have never been here it is definitely worth checking out. You will not be disappointed.
After a very average first dining experience over a year ago, I went back to Il Fornaio for dinner with some good friends. We were waited upon by an ultra-efficient and very friendly waiter who was just the right mix of banter and professionalism. Most importantly, she got our order perfectly correct - even with all our special requests and deviations from the standard menu. We had bruschetta and salads to start. I had the grilled salmon with steamed vegetables for my main course, followed by a bowl of assorted berries for dessert. This was a healthy meal , yet it was  prepared to perfection and the result was delicious. After reading a slew of bad reviews I was not expecting much, but our evening was superb and the meal far exceeded my expectations. What a pleasant surprise in Palo Alto for a change!
Despite some very good reviews about this well known Italian restaurant in the Valley, I had a very... Read more 
Always a good meal.  Reasonably priced and reliable good Italian food.  Convenient downtown location.  Very friendly staff.  Excellent seafood pasta.
Great food... Good service
Food is decent here, but I think I've had better italian specialty pasta at other places. Must try: Butternut squash soup, caprese, capellini pomodo (angel hair pasta), pappardelle (broad fettuccini pasta). Best place to sit is either outside or at the bar area. Good service.
As others have said, 2 stars for the ambiance. Out on the patio, white tablecloths, heat lamps that nearly roasted us, nice waitstaff, it feels like a classy dining experience. Great bread too... Other than that, food is sub par. But it feels like a special experience, so we go, mostly with out of town older people. To start with, the menu is ridiculously complicated and over pretentious. Had to translate and explain to others. Also way too many options and descriptions should be in English. Who are they kidding? The food is across the board edible but unremarkable. Had the antipasti, it was ok, nothing to get excited about. The seafood linguine was also OK, just bland and a bit boring (I was too full from the bread by then). Others had grilled fish plate, small size, underseasoned. The calzone was a hit with the young'ns though. So perhaps their pizzas are the best offering, which kind of clashes with the formal ambiance. That and the bread, I highly recommend the bread...
I don't really eat here by "choice" per se.  I work right in the area, so it's very convenient to come to Il Fornaio with pizzas and pastas ready within 20 minutes.  I generally eat my food to go, but I've also eaten in the restaurant two or three times. BREADS (3.5/5):  They have whole wheat, ciabatta, breads with rosemary, olives, walnuts or raisins, sourdough and white bread. If you're a carb lover like me, get the olive bread-- so good and you don't often find it everywhere. The rosemary bread is good, but they give that complementary as table side and to-go dinner rolls. The loaves of bread aren't very soft, but they're so tasty and delicious that it'll satisfy your need for carbs. :) PIZZAS (4/5):  #1 Choice: Pizza Vegetariana is for the win: roasted eggplant, chunks of artichoke, light cheese, plump tomatoes... delicious!  #2 Choice: I've also had their Pizza Cristina (mozzarella, prosciutto, shaved Parmesan ), which is great because Il Fornaio is so generous with their meats. I think this also comes with fresh mushrooms and wild arugula, but they gave such a big layer of prosciutto and Parmesan that I didn't even notice any vegetables. #3 Choice: The Pizza Fradiavola is good too-- the red onions make the pizza because it's mildly sweet and complements the Italian sausage and bell peppers beautifully. It's a kind of "reddish pink" pizza because of the red onions, spicy peperoncino oil and tomato sauce, but it's really delicious. If you're debating between CA Pizza Kitchen (literally right across the street) and Il Fornaio for pizza, go to Il Fornaio (unless you want CPK's bbq chicken). Grigliata Costa Smeralda (4/5): What a delicious and light appetizer!  I'd recommend ordering the parsley sauce on the side because you'll find that the seafood is buttery and tasty on its own. You get a fresh selection of grilled scallops, calamari and jump shrimp that are fired up to perfection with a little burnt crisp on its edges. Ravioli alla Lucana (3.5/5):  It's sooo good! If you're craving something substantial that's still in the pasta family,t he ravioli is great! Saucy and generous, the ravioli is filled with all kinds of good stuff, including fresh sausage, basil, spinach and cheeses. Pennoni alla Vodka: The description online seems so impressive-- Large pasta tubes with bacon, vodka-cream-tomato sauce and parmesan cheese. The thing is... I saw the large pasta tubes, but it wasn't "filled" with yummy goodness. I don't think this is very substantial because I thought it'd be packed with more meat. Instead, this seemed like a very cheesy tube-filled pasta roll. Wait Staff:  SO nice!  I love them, especially Pablo.  He's so sweet and gives you complementary bread and cookies. He's great with recommendations and is generally a nice person who makes the whole to-go and dine-in experience so pleasant.
Oh so average food, over-priced, and a stuffy atmosphere. They get the stars from me solely since they are open for breakfast and it's usually not too crowded.
A friend told me about this restaurant and after looking at the menu I wad excited to go. What a disappointment!  The prices are outrageous for what you get. The "large" portion of my pennaloni a la vodka was $16 and tiny. Cheapest glass of wine is more than $7 and again, tiny. They delivered my tiny dish of pasta so fast that I had to wait 5+ minutes just to get my glass of wine.  Wasn't sure if they were trying to get me out of there quickly or if they had extra pasta laying around, but either way I was not very impressed by the way they do things. I won't be going here again..
It was my brothers pick to come here to celebrate our moms bday. He says the food it really good. So we all agreed to come here for dinner. Our reservations were for 6:30 and we were there on time. Upon opening the doors and making our way in, we were greeted with smiles. We were seated promptly. Bread was brought to the table as well as some oil/vinegar were poured into shallow plates. Our waters were poured as I looked over the menu - everything sounded good. After careful consideration, I choose the scallopine. It was good, nothing like ooooh, aaaah but just good. The polenta looked like it was glued to my plate, it too was good. It reminded me of Cream of Wheat. My brother got the butternut squash raviolis. I got a taste of that - yum. Creamy and delicious. My husband got the chicken with spinach & potatoes. That too was tasty. Plus you get a good sized portion. I looked up to see the table next to us, someone got a pizza. The thing was huge. It's bigger than a small. But smaller than a med pizza you'd get from pizza hut, but here they make the dough fresh. I love that the kitchen is open for all to see, as I was able to see it as we went to our table & when we left. I believe the restaurant is connected to a hotel, I was able to jump onto their wifi from the restaurant. There's a nice sized parking garage across the street. That's a plus. Service was excellent. No probs there. All that I didn't like was the tables were so small, for our group of 7, I expected a larger table. But the waiters were keeping on top of clearing dishes. Hope to come back soon to try other dishes.
I have to say...they have the BEST french toast on their weekend breakfast/brunch menu! A great back room for private parties! The best service!  We go at least once per week!!!
Great spot for some good Italian foods. This place has not changed over the 205 years I've been going to it. Very consistent, nice atmosphere and location is nice for a walk in Palo Alto after dinner. Pizza's are excellent everything else seems fine. The highlight to me is the biscuits they sell up at the front. Get a dozen to go for  tea or coffee. Tons of parking across the street in the parkade, skip the valet.
Excellent Maitre de was bit good They tried to seat us in a cramped space
There is outdoor patio seating, traditional indoor seating and counter seating. I think its really fun to sit up at the counter of the open kitchen. You get to watch them making your meal and you have the opportunity to see all of the other dishes that go out. The Rustichella and their pizzas are delicious.
Elegant venue with a sunny center deck. Rustichella and Conchiglie al Pollo were good for eating and talking with friends. Parking can be hard in Palo Alto, but a good restaurant to try if you are in the area.
Nice impressive environment, good for business meetings. Wouldn't personally come here for the food though.
The salads are a waste of money.   They're tastless. The bread and oil baskets are wonderful. Their house wines are very well priced and tend to be good. The entress are pretty much hit or miss depending on who's making it and how busy they are.  No consistency there. The staff is OK. Go for the bread, the ambiance and don't expect too much.
Went there first time for birthday lunch, then went back again as it was good. It was originally a bread house, then expanding over the past 25 years (at least). The name means oven, fornaio derives from Cali-fornia (hot oven). That's what I heard, you may verify with Spanish. Bread is famous and great. Italian style. Service is good. It seems they waitress are pretty happy there, and like to create good interaction with you. But last time they mixed up or forgot what we ordered because a waitress was trying to "remember" what we ordered instead of writing them down.  Good place for up-scale casual family and friend dinning.
What can I say. If food, atmosphere and service is what you look for in a restaurant, I highly recommend this joint. Every dish I have tried so far has been great. The waiters have always been extremely friendly and helpful. Always an abundance of people having a good time. Love the atmosphere. My one complaint is that the servers need to put on some kind of glove on when grating the cheese. I saw her bare-hand the bathroom door. I believe waiters should use paper towels to do that since not everyone bothers to use soap and water before exiting.
I felt compelled to write a review due to some here that are very far from my experience!  My husband and I visit Il Fornaio at least once or twice a month.  One of the reasons we come is for the excellent service.  Carlos and Chris are especially wonderful, but all the servers are great. The bread is warm and delicious, with lovely bits of rosemary.  The minestrone soup is chock full of veggies, and, mercifully, not overly salted (a pet peeve!).  The salmon is a favorite, as is the delicious over-sized non-meat ravioli (can't remember the name).  Another favorite is a very filling salad with fava beans and avocado.  An organic greens salad is a little dull, so I simply no longer order it.  My husband always discovers  a delicious wine. We prefer to sit in the front part of the restaurant as it's fun to be near the open kitchen.  (Do try to avoid the tables by the loos.)   My only wish is that the tables and little booths for two were roomier for a more leisurely feel.  But the ambience is warm and pleasant and the restaurant does not get overly loud, as do some on University Ave.  As we are semi-regulars we are often now greeted by the very nice and efficient bus boys.  They work so hard. There are no complaints about this Il Fornaio, only kudos.  My only suggestion would be the addition of more vegetarian dishes.
I had a delicious dinner at Il Fornaio.  I guess by the looks of the other comments, I got lucky!   The tomato based soup was a bit too strong for my taste, but the Ravioli (we tried the butternut squash ravioli as well as a ravioli with mushroom sauce and proscuitto) was very flavorful and well made.  The sauces were delicious, and complimented the pasta very well. It is located in Downtown Palo Alto, a very nice neighborhood.  The restaurant has a classy ambiance and I found that the service was pleasant and efficient. Had a scrumptious dessert sampler with a chocolate mousse raspberry cake, ice cream, apple crepe, and tirimisu. I all in all had a very nice experience at Il Fornaio.
I've been to several Il Fornaio restaurants.  These are slightly upscale itallian restaurants with open kitchens.  They do a pretty standard itallian menu, nothing too creative and not too many risks taken with their menu. But what they do they generally do very well.  I don't have very many complaints (except for their minestrone soup), about the food they serve here.  It's a little on the pricey side, but their ingredients and ambiance are top notch.  The service is usually pretty good. The do bake their own bread (out of their burlingame location).  I often come here for a cup of coffe and a baguette with butter, sometimes with a bowl of soup.  Their bread is very good, and when they bring it to your table there is usually a good selection of flat breads and traditional raised breads to choose from. It's a little pricey, but for the location and ambiance, it's not outrageous.
Food is discusting here and really expensive. The employees are kind and respectful. Not so great for a fancy restaurant though.
It was a rush rush day to begin with. First sending out estimates all morning, fighting fires, gym, and a last minute call to get my hair cut with one of my favorite person that I've met since I moved here. She's a really good hair dresser and she wanted to thank me for all the client I was able to help find her at the new place. We wanted to go to Tamarine but bummer, they close between lunch and dinner. Why do restaurants do that? It 's before 3pm for goodness sake. Well, maybe we'll go there one day.Back to II Fornaio We really only got appetizers  at Il Fornaio because I was so hungry when I got out of the gym I sneaked in a subway or I would have fainted. So the 3 stars is for the crab cakes and Carpaccio. The Carpaccio I could do without, it just had too much olive oil on it.But their crab cakes was pretty good. They had a very light sauce that didn't overpower so you could actually taste the crabs. They served a fair amount of italian bread too for free. We got served at the bar because the patio didn't have servers working yet, but they took care of us when we sat outside. I can see that the restaurant is a cozy open space type restaurant. The patio was very nice because heck the scenery is peaceful Palo Alto. The company was great, a sweet girl that I wish I knew a nice guy to set her up with. She deserves more than your average looser. So guys, if you're into asian sweet girls and you need a hair cut. And you tip. I know where you can go. Added bonus, I hear she loves poker playing.
No stars. None. Zero. Been there with family many times - I love the place. Food is generally excellent. It's a standby. Service is absolutely abhorrent. Terrible. Stupid. Retarded. Idiotic. Avoid like the plague. I wanted to take the girlfriend out on a Sunday Lunch/Dinner. We were seated after a 5 minute wait - in an empty dining room (everyone was sitting outside). Bread and water took 10 minutes to come. Then no one talked to us for 20 minutes. We put the menus down - waited. No one said a damn thing to us. Not even for a drink order! Then another couple came in, sat down, and was waited on instantly. Needless to say, we got up and left. Screw 'em. I dropped my $80 at Madison & 5th up the street and was happy about it. Avoid like the plague. I've had better service at Jack in the Box.
I love this Il Fornaio in particular- good service, great food & wine and romantic atmosphere! Love the thought of a date night at Il Fornaio.....fun fun fun!
It had been a few years since we'd been back to Il Fornaio. A friend gave us a gift certificate so this was a great opportunity to revisit the place. Service at this place is quite good. The hostesses are friendly and prompt, and the waiters know their stuff. If there's one thing that didn't shine, it's that we were seated at a table right by the server's station, so I was treated to somewhat regular ratting of flatware in my ear. It wasn't awful, but it was far from ideal. We ordered from special regional menu, since it had some options that sounded tasty. Potato leek soup - This was disappointing. It was pretty bland. Green salad w/ fennel, carrot, red wine vinegar, and polenta chips - This was okay, but nothing special. The vinegar overpowered the rest of the flavors. I think we were disappointed mainly because the server said this was an excellent salad, and it really wasn't anything more than okay. Rigatoni in a creamy mushroom and pancetta sauce - The pasta was cooked very nicely. The sauce had a nice meaty flavor, with good mushrooms (although not a strong enough mushroom flavor, imo.) The sauce too thick, though, which brought it a little too close to congealing. Still quite good, though. Butternut squash gnocchi - The gnocchi has a wonderful pillowy texture. The one thing they didn't have was any kind of a butternut squash flavor. The cream sauce was subtle, and didn't have the texture problems I found with the rigatoni. Double-thick chop, wrapped in bacon, served with cooked pears and new potatoes - I do love pork with my pork. The meat was cooked very nicely, although I found that the bacon didn't hold up well. It was a little hard, probably from the time finishing in the oven. (Interestingly, the bacon was better when we reheated the leftovers the next day.) The pears went well with the pork. The potatoes were potatoes. Double-breast of chicken served with a wine sauce, sweet and sour cabbage, and mashed potatoes - The chicken was juicy, the sauce was excellent. The mashed potatoes were flavorful but inconsistently mashed. Not sure if that was by design, and it wasn't necessarily a bad thing, just unexpected. The cabbage was good, too. Chocolate mousse tort - Really tasty mousse. Nice and chocolaty without being overly sweet. And it traveled well as a to-go dessert. Overall, my impressions of the food is that it's a bit all over the place. Some of it was meh, some of it was very good. Unfortunately, I don't think there was anything that wowed us. Will I go back? I won't hesitate if someone wants to eat here, but I don't think it's so good to justify a special trip to Palo Alto (from San Carlos.)
Three of those stars are for Alexi alone.  He always manages to get the kitchen to pump out one last pizza for us, even though they're closed.  This is a favorite post-work place to head to for myself and my co-workers.  Lots of bonding goes on at the bar while we sip wine and eat the best late night pizza pie in PA.
3 strikes and you're out. i really want to like this place.  it's close to my house, the prices are okay and they serve up good italian comfort food.  i'm tired of the pretentious hosts (do you have a reservation?  i hate being asked this when i'm staring at a half empty restaurant).  plus, i've almost missed a train waiting for the bill for more than 20 minutes and my guest had a half cooked entree in bearnaise sauce.  no wonder there are always empty tables...
This place gets two stars for the flat bread (which was deelish) and the bus guy (so friendly and gracious)...the other 3 stars were lost on service (our waiter was miserable), the salad (waaaay overdressed and meagre) and the steep price tag (appetizers and a glass of wine is $40?  Ouch.)
Not a good brunch spot.  The food is average, price is high and the waiter is rude.  Go to St. Michaels instead if at all possible.
Bizzare service; pushy, tried to upsell too much; and portions small and not very good.
I have been avoiding Il Fornaio lately because I had terrible experience in few of their establishments around the Bay but I had to have an early dinner at 5 pm and there was no other choices around at that time so I did venture in. To my surprisefood was good. My friend and I enjoyed a very nice bottle of Pino and excellently prelared Bronzino with vegetables. Service was decent but very spotty and we had to wait for a while in an almost empty restaurant to get in our order of water and wine but overall I think this chain is improving.
Not bad. I wasn't expecting much, but the whole snapper I ordered was quite tasty. My gf ordered the rotisserie chicken which was slightly overcooked and somewhat bland (needed a lot of salt and pepper). The desserts were uninspired. Seems like a good place to go if you are hankering for decent Italian and don't want to spend too much $.
The French Toast is excellent (see photo).  I think it is best when you ask for it "lightly soaked" (otherwise it's a soggy mess) and "very well browned"
**This is for experience with a phone request**   While I have been to this restaurant and haven't been overwhelmed by its food or service to prompt a review, the phone reception I received just now warrants one.  Restaurants are in the service industry and being told "5:30pm is our service time and this is really not the time to call about your request" delivered with no small amount of annoyance and attitude renders a customer frustrated, feeling ill treated and basically ticked off.  That's ensuring a non-return for certain.  And this from the supposed management on staff.  The wait staff answering the phone had much better phone manners.  Please work on your attitudes before transferring your frustrations to your customers.
Mixed experiences. On May 7 I met a friend here for breakfast. Wonderful French toast with mascarpone, nice hot chocolate, good service. It was overall a very pleasant experience. Four stars. On July 4 my husband and I met friends for dinner. Holy cow, these two meals could not have been more different. The first serious sign of trouble was when the waiter brought orders for everyone but my buddy's wife. He turned to her and asked, "What did you order again?" Seriously? *Seriously?* This still makes the little E in my head run around in circles flailing. All he said was "Sorry about that," rather curtly. No, dude, look. If you FORGET TO ENTER SOMEONE'S ORDER, the proper response is to grovel. Kneeling is not necessary, but if you don't show mortification on your face, UR DOIN IT WRONG. By the time she got her food, the rest of us were pretty much done. My buddy and I talked about it after he walked away: "He didn't even apologize!" I said in disgust. (Note that I do not consider what he did say to be a proper apology.) It became clear that the waiter had overheard us as he walked back and forth, because AFTER we paid our bill (10 percent tip, thanks), he brought us a card for a free dessert or drink. Yeah, no. I looked around for the manager in order to let her know what a jerk our waiter was but had no luck in catching her eye. The place wasn't even crowded! Not that it would have excused it if it had been, but geez. One star. Too bad I can't leave -5 just for that waiter. Doubt I'll ever be back. I'm averaging these two experiences to a two-star in order to be charitable.
Went here for dinner. Ambiance was great as it is with all the other Il Fornaios. The service was fine however, the pasta was a bit undercooked. Expected a bit more from the Palo Alto Il Fornaios as I have never experienced any negatives in the San Jose and Walnut Creek restaurants
I've been to a few Il Fornaio locations including Palo Alto, Coronado, and Beverly Hills. I wouldn't say Palo Alto is my favorite location nor is it my least favorite. The food was good. The place was kinda more stufy than usual. The service was excellent. Price is normal compared to the rest. They had a lack of great dessert choices in my opinion but others might differ. I prefer the Coronado location by a mile!
Pretty basic/standard Italian fare. Nothing super exciting as far as the food goes. But my dad likes it so we come on a fairly regular basis. Service is usually good and it's not too loud or too fancy. It's a good standby when you aren't  sure where to go....
came here last night for a birthday dinner, me and my bf shared the chicken potatoes and spinach dish, priced at around $15-$18. We had a party of about 14 and the service was pretty slow. It was hard to get our water filled and it took a while to get our food. The good thing was that we got seated in a less noisy area, a corner all the way in the back of the restaurant, mainly because we had a large group, on the bad side, it seemed like they forgot about us for long periods of time. I tried a taste of my friends dish (chicken, shelled pasta, brocolli, and sundried tomatoes)- it was pretty delicious. sorry i dont remember the names of the dishes, but i remember their descriptions =)
We've dined at Il Fornaio with and sans kids.  It is great for a date night, suitable for a family gathering and even functional for the little ones.  They supply coloring pages and crayons.  According to my 6-year-old daughter, they make some of the best mac and cheese she's ever had!  She's the pickiest eater in the family (a title formerly held by my husband) so this is high praise.  We've dined indoors, outdoors and in the heated tented patio area and enjoyed stellar service each time.  We love the Il Fornaio salad,  I'm very fond of their risottos, --- there is always a very interesting one on special --- their Grey Goose Cosmopolitans and the olive bread!!
I've been to Il Fornaio for dinner a few times now. You definitely can't go wrong with it, it's just nothing amazing. They have lots of affordable options and they are all reasonably sized entrees. Every time I've gone, the servers are very kind. The pre-dinner bread isn't anything special. I'd definitely suggest any of the seafood options and of course any pasta entree. The desserts are okay. If you are looking for a somewhat nice dinner that wont break the bank try this place out.
This place is just your average Itallian place.  The food is good as well as the location.  Unfortunately at this location the seats indoors tend to be really close to the other tables....hence the reason for my 3 stars.  Casual dining nothing fancy.
Wow. Yelp doesn't lie. Mediocre food + high prices = BAD. Got a pizza which was way too salty and soggy in the center and a pasta that tasted like it was from a can. The bread was good, which is one saving grace. The bill at the end was outrageous for the blah food we got. STAY AWAY.
Yeah, it's a fancy restaurant. The food is good but it's nothing amazing.
came here for a holiday company lunch. the separate back room that was reserved for our intimate group was quite inviting. unfortunately i was the last of my party to arrive due to the traffic on university at the time, however the hostess welcomed and directed me to the join the rest of the group graciously. the service and meal was exceptional. our waiter was prompt and detailed. glasses were never empty, nor was the bread baskets. it was a group meal package i assume, as the lunch was served in courses. i arrived somewhere mid third course, but our waiter made sure i didn't miss out on the first two! all the dishes were delicious, especially dessert! parking near university has always been an issue. fortunately for me i found a spot right behind the restaurant in the border's lot.
I am giving THE  FOOD  FOUR STARS and the SERVICE ONE STAR for just being present .The food is awesome but our waiter David W. .....RUDE! He's the overweight bald headed man. You can't  mistake him for anyone else.The last few times I was there and had him as a waiter it was dreadful. He'd forget our drinks and had to be reminded . One time we got several appetizers as our main course and one of my friends in our group got a regular entree for their main course. We specifically told him to bring out everything at same time,but of course, that didn't happen and it took 25 minutes before the last dish came. Last night , my white wine glass got knocked over before I could even take a sip. I told David W. the waiter, I spilled my wine and his reply was,"oh it did?" As if I was lying to get a free refill. He simply put our dishes down on a wet wine soaked table and didn't even offer to change the table cloth, offer any extra napkins or get me another glass of wine. Naturally,I got charged for the glass of wine I didn't drink. I know I should've  maybe made another attempt or talk to a manager, but I wasn't in the mood to make a big stink about all the times David has been rude and unfriendly. I will just try and steer clear of him.  I love the food at Il Fornaio and so do my friends from Rome. It is too bad one waiter can make the experience bad on more than one occasion.
After reading so many bad reviews, I was expecting the worse. However, it actually wasnt THAT bad. Maybe it's not the greatest food for the price, but because of good company and drinks, I still enjoyed the night. I definitely wouldn't come here when I'm looking for great amazing with great atmosphere, but my hunger was satisfied.
Good food, OK prices, good service. One thing that I LOVE here is the assortments of breads brought to your table gratis. DELICIOUS! One sleeper here are the pizzas. Small pizzas, but fairly priced and truly delicious. Fish can vary here and is often overwhelmed by sauces. Steaks are good, but nothing memorable. Pastas are probably the best items on the menu, very flavorful and the portions are quite generous. You will never have a bad meal here, but you will rarely have a truly memorable one. They don't take enough risks and play to center field. They always get on base but they rarely hit a homer. The management should cut the exec chef loose and let him try something a little more on the wild side. I'll bet they would get a surprisingly good customer response! Desserts tend to be on the heavy side, but are top quality and very fresh. The staff is friendly and the atmosphere is warm.
Great food, especailly good for breakfasts. A bit expensive though
I've been to this Il Fornaio location many times -- mostly for breakfast meetings.  The morning food and service has always been consistent, which has made it one of my go-to places for an early morning business meal. Tonight's experience at Il Fornaio has, however, caused me to reconsider whether I should return.  We took our two kids plus out-of-town friends (and their two kids) to dinner at Il Fornaio.  Our dinner experiences with children at other Il Fornaio locations have always been fine.  We expected the same at the PA location. The food quality was OK and our meals arrived quickly.  However, the wait staff couldn't have been less happy about serving a table with four kids.  From the moment we arrived, our waiter was clearly less than thrilled that he would be dealing with a table with so many children.  The sighs and dirty looks from him, and several other members of the wait staff, continued throughout our meal. As we were leaving, the manager came by to ask how our meal was.  I shared my feeling that his staff could have been more friendly to me, our guests, and especially our children.  He apologized, but then noted that the restaurant expects kids to be well-behaved (as though my youngest son's dropping of two forks and a little milk on the floor qualifies as bad behavior). Il Fornaio PA, if you don't want kids to eat at your restaurant, remove the kids menu and don't serve dinner at family-friendly times.
This is a mixed review for several reasons. Firstly, I was there on Mardi Gras night, and the atmosphere was great though loud.  The menu was a bit confusing, in that there were special "festival" items served in smaller portions so you could sample, but included on this list were items that were NOT served in that way.  Needless to say, we had to negotiate at least three times with the waiter over which food was available and how.  We had appetizers, and while they seemed, from the descriptions, to be amazing and interesting foods, we found both to be lack luster.  My husband's was basically a quiche with stinging nettles on, and my soup was UTTERLY flavorless and mushy.  We ordered two entrees, one a pork chop which was AMAZING, and the other a risotto which was WRONG WRONG WRONG.  First of all, it was just rice, no pulling, no spreading across the plate, no milky texture, just flavorless rice that we salted to the nines and traded back and forth just to get some carbohydrates.  We did a wine flight, and that was fantastic, the waiter gave us great advice and I had one of the best white wines I've ever had.  The dessert was STUNNING and just amazing. we were there for a long time, enjoyed the staff and the setting, but the food was WAY overpriced and given that there were so many misses, I'm not sure I'd come back for anything but the dessert.  I think people who gave this place higher than 3 stars, must not eat at really great places very often, either that, or they feel okay making an allowance for an "american" risotto.  I don't.  Rice is rice, risotto is risotto. Fun place, but I've been to Italy, and eaten there.  Not impressed with the assertion that it's "real" Italian food.
HAPPY HOUR everyone!  WHat a great spread they put out for Happy hour at 5:00PM-wonderful bruschettas on warmed crispy french bread-not just tomato, but wonderful mixed marinated peppers and eggplant, and a couple of their wonderful thin crust tasty pizzas, with proscutto, or a veggie articghoke one.  The only draw back is they place the hordeuves along the bar and you have to reach or the kind considerate bartenders serve you from time to time.  So place yourself in the middle of the bar, annouce you are there for happy hour and let the games begin!  Andre' very nice and attentive bartender as well as Gabrielle!
I have been to this restaurant many times in the past and enjoyed many of their dishes along with great service. Prices are fairly reasonable and the setting is very beautiful inside, I would recommend sitting out in the patio area by the fountain on a nice day. I have tried their pizza(great portion size and very tasty, well cooked), pastas and raviolis are delicious as well. The fresh baked bread that is given before your meal is a great way to start your experience there. One of my favorite all time dishes is one of their desersts,, zambioni made with fresh fruit and other delicious ingredients.. A must have after dinner!! I rated this restaurant 3 stars because of my last visit their, very disappointed. It was my moms birthday and we have always enjoyed coming here to have a great experience but not this time..  Our waiter was not very attentive to us making sure we were satisfied with everything. In the beginning I asked for some lemons with my water, never given to me,, after we ordered and received our food, we were never checked up on or asked how everything was.. In this case my mom ordered a dish that she said was too salty for her but we were never approached until later after they noticed that we were not eating anymore. The waiter then collected our plates and only offered us coffee and not deserts in which we wanted to have a desert,, ((the waitress that was waiting on the table next to us was much more attentive to her guests and also presented the desert cart as well as asking if they were interested)). Overall we felt slightly different from others who were receiving much great service than we were. To add icing on the cake,, I did not leave much of a tip for our waiter due to our service. After walking out from the restaurant, we were approached from the waiter asking us if we left the correct amount of $$ ,,meaning he wanted more $$ for his tip.. Very  inappropriate and unnecessary to approach us like that. Instead of coming after us for more $$,, he should of thought to himself,, I must have done something wrong or what could I have done better.. You don't chase customers asking for more $$.. If I receive great service,, then I tip accordingly.. I also work in customer service and get tips as well but I have never chased after a client/customer due to the fact of not receiving a big tip... I'm not sure if this guy was a new waiter filling in for someone but we have experienced much better service before. I don't recall the waiters name otherwise I would mention it to the restaurant as well as on here too..
I came here for my birthday because I wanted tiramisu for dessert. The wait was horrendous, it was about an hour before we got our orders even though I made reservations. Yes it was busy, and the waitress kept apologizing, but they were very understaffed. The manager came and comped the dessert because we waited so long, but I don't know if I'll go back based on that experience. I have had better experiences at other Il Fornaios.
The scallop is fresh, the shrimp is big, the noodle is tough. And also has mussels and clam. The bread is good too. Good in my mind.
This place looks magnificent like baller status but the food is just ok. It's not bad but its not great and for the price I would go elsewhere. Had a company dinner here in the open roof area in the middle of the restaurant. The setting is great but the food is too ordinary.
I don't like the Il Fornaio chain. In fact, I will give most of them 1 or 2 stars. However, I came to this one for desserts and coffee; which turned out to be a good idea. When you are ordering pre-made desserts like tiramisu and etc. and coffee your food seems to just float out almost immediately. Also, everything tasted pretty darn good. My mother, is the one who dragged me here and maybe they decided to do a good job in order to spite me? I dunno, don't care. I was just glad it all worked out. However, minus one star for the name and affiliation.
I was so impressed with the staff and the facility. My fellow admin Vicki P booked the large private dining room in the back to host a company baby shower. This space is gorgeous in the daytime. If you ever want to hold a luncheon or any daytime event, use this space. The wood floors and tables just give it a very sunny and welcoming vibe. I was in charge of decorating and the staff went above and beyond. They let me use service entrances, set up early and they took pictures for us. Plus the person we gave the baby shower for was completely shocked (it was a suprise) as well. I will be using this space again.
Had a late lunch, so good thing they serve all day. Parking on street limited to 2 hours. Cafe au lait was pretty weak, free refills on coke, but they charged us $7.50 for one lemonade with one refill. The olive bread was very tasty. Linguine Mare with mussels, shrimp, clams and scallops was good, mussels a bit fishy, and the sauce was overbearing. Lasagna Ferrares very generous, but my spinach with sausage ravioli was a mishmash of flavors, the sauce overwhelmed the fresh tomatoes, some melted cheese covered only a portion of it, and the pasta was a bit tough. Service was okay, atmosphere is nice. Three people, $76 with tip. Not really worth it.
Its very hard pressed looking for a great Italian place in Palo Alto for there are just soooo many to choose from.. this place underneath a nice hotel in downtown just hits the mark.  A franchise but does really well with decor and giving the authentic experience.  the food was well prepped and very tasty..they have a smaller portion menu if you dont want to share your food on the table or take it home with the full order.. the ambience and decor and wine list are a big plus . well done. 3.5/5 judochops
Three stars for food, 5 stars for dessert.  The best tiramisu I've ever tasted and the custard dish that starts with a Z, my oh my!  Can't find it anywhere else... yet.
Il Fornaio's Thanksgiving Feast was exceptional!  Delicious food (with choice of price fixe menu or ala carte), thoughtful, attentive service (not rushed), pleasant ambience (full but not overcrowded). We LOVED it and will make it a family tradtion.
My husband's parents really like this place so we come here a few times a year. The food isn't good, but I don't really love Italian so take that for whatever it's worth. Decent breakfast though.
My friend, Eva, the event manager at Il Fornaio, Palo Alto invited a few of us to a delightful dinner of exquisite pasta and seafood that was out of this world. First, the ambiance, after twenty years, is still one of the best in the Bay Area. The bean soup along with their trademark bread was superb as was the Gnocchi and Capellini al Pomodoro. The waiters were very attentive and kept the water and wine flowing. It has been a long time since I've eaten at Il Fornaio and I'm glad I had this chance to sample some of their finest. Of course, the friends and the old stories really made the evening. Great place to have nice meal and enjoy the company and relax.
I really want to like this place, but the food is mediocre and sometimes the room smells funny. They do have a pretty and large outside area, though, and a full bar with a nice Russian bartender.
The place was empty when my mom and I entered at 9 pm on a Sunday night.  The town of Palo Alto is fairly dead in the summertime on Sunday nights so I guess this was typical.  One would think that the service would be friendly and prompt considering the situation.  But... the service was awful.  Our waiter was so unfriendly in fact that one might wonder if he had any personality what so ever.  I think not.  He was so lazy that he even spoke to us from the wait stand which was a good 2 feet from our table.  I mean at that point it was like, "COME ON GUY, PULL IT TOGETHER."  My basic spinach balsamic salad was so oily, I felt like I wanted to wash my face after a few bites.  My capellini pasta with diced tomatoes was tasty and my mom enjoyed her squash ravioli.  Other than that, the experience was one to forget.
Had a party here and our group of 15+ folks was given a table in a private space that was pretty awesome. Food and service was good too. Some entrees were hit and miss and there was some confusion during billing time... but service was excellent and super attentive. I'd definitely go back.
Not bad......Jane and I came here for a leisurely Sunday brunch and I ordered a grilled smoked salmon flatbread and she ordered some poached eggs with dungeness crab.  Both were pretty tasty, though not what I quite expected. I was expecting less cheese in the grilled salmon on toast, and I was expecting Jane's poached eggs to be a little less messy. Also, the service was slow and left much to be desired, particularly because they made two big mistakes, they brought me cold coffee, and then they brought the wrong dish for jane. I thought the inside of the restaurant was very "cute" and it was well heated which was a nice touch on a cold day, but besides that, I thought the food was ok ,nothing great, nothing bad. I think it was the good company that really made the meal memorable:)
Tried their brunch this weekend.  They have a nice selection and their mimosas are delicious.  I was a bit uninspired and had the packages.  They were really good, but they need a great fruit topping.  I asked for strawberries and bananas, but didn't get nearly enough.  If you have the pancakes or french toast make sure to ask for creme anglais.
I thought this place was pretty good. I'm not really an Italian food aficionado but the service was good and the waiter was friendly. Though I have to say my meat was a little undercooked (I ordered it medium rare so maybe that's expected?) and my dates food was a bit salty (but she left me only the mozzarella in the pasta so maybe that's expected?) The wine was nice though. It kind of sounds like I didn't like it much but I did. 3 stars worth.
please don't get me wrong, I've had really nice dinners at this place on weeknights, but YUCK!  Whatever you do, don't go here for lunch on a weekday and expect anything decent.  My boss took a few of us out to celebrate finishing a project and we spent almost 2 HOURS in Il Fornaio.  Only 30 minutes of that was eating.  I ordered a turkey sandwich on focaccia with cheese and a side salad. We waited for about an hour for our food, languished without water once or twice and when my food finally came it was inedible.  The only reason I did not send it back it was because I didn't want my boss to feel bad and and I wanted to leave soon!  The bread was not just toasted, but burned, the salad was wilted from being under a heat lamp or near an oven.  The sandwich had ONE slice of cheese and 2 package sized slices of turkey.  That is not an $9 sandwich.  The rest of my party found the food simply mediocre. Try this place for dinner sometime on a quiet night and you might actually get service and decent food.  In the past I have really enjoyed their pasta dishes, which is why It got 2 stars rather than 1.
The drink I had? With the Rosemary? Delicious.
I think the food here is always decent and the ambiance is nice for a more formal meal.  I usually get the seafood pasta or pizzas.  They have a cute area in the back for private events.  What I really like here though is the dessert cart :)  Makes me want to order one of everything.  I was addicted to the Rosina for a while (hard core chocolate richness going on there).  For some thing lighter, the Zabaione is great.  But my favorite ended up being the simplest item - the Affogato Al Caffe (espresso on vanilla ice cream - so simple yet sooooo good).
The food was pretty good - but not great. Ended up ordering the Linguine Mare (mussels, clams, shrimp, scallops in a tomato sauce) which was good and tasteful, however, the scallops were a bit rubbery and difficult to slice through. The guy filling my hot water teapot was very attuned to all the refills I needed.
Il Fornaio is awesome, with a very nice ambiance! We had a great dinner - starting with the freshly baked OLIVE bread with pieces of olive in the bread - absolutely delicious; three samples of wines, salad, and the special of the evening was the rack of lamb and they did a great job; for dessert we had the tiramisu and at the end cappuccino - you need to ask them to make it wet otherwise the cappuccino is too bitter. The service was nice. Reservations are always needed.
It's an okay restaurant, but price to quality remains mediocre. Had bruschettas, salmon and ice cream. The entree was disappointing, but the dessert delicious.
Me and my girl went here for dinner and our waiter looked/talked exactly like Dominico from Shot at Love with Tila Tequila.  Was that him?  The food was pretty good, but I think I will need to give it one more shot to get a good feel for this place.    The seating was prompt and they gave us a very good spot.  I would definitely go back.
This is another good place to take your kid for pizza at the counter (not a bar: you watch the cooks). These individual pizzas are the best because this is a real Italian restaurant using high-quality ingredients. I have a hard time with the regular dining areas because the chairs are cane and sunken, which folds up my back, and the booths are too close to the tables and sometimes too low. That's too bad, because I enjoy the food, and the wine's decent. The monthly regional specials offer unique insights into different styles of Italian cooking.
The food wasn't memorable.  It was only ok.  Although I really like the decor at this restaurant.
This place is a great Italian restaurant. The service and food is similar to the San Francisco branch. Unfortunately, this place doesn't compare in terms of style and ambiance. But it does have a great family atmosphere which I though the San Francisco location lacked.
Elegant, excellent service, and reliable if not extremely interesting food.  Easy to work with if coordinating a more formal group dinner.  I liked the butternut squash ravioli with brown butter and sage.
Bait and switch! We went here for the campania special prix-fixe menu.  After we tried to order they informed us that was not available until 5pm. By then, it was late enough that we really didn't want to try to find somewhere else for food. The food we ended up with was okay but they made several mistakes in the service and it just ended up not making up for the unexpected menu change.
We celebrated our 15 Yr Wedding Anniversary with dinner here on 9/9/10. Why here? Il Fornaio is where he proposed to me! Since our reservations were earlier in the evening, parking was not a problem and we were given a choice of where we wanted to sit.  We chose the outdoor covered patio area. Our server was very knowledgeable about the specials for the evening and even suggested a very nice glass of wine.  The ambiance at Il Fornaio is very authentic Italian and adds to a great dining experience. My husband had the "Taste of Sicilia" which was comprised of a selection of 3 items from a menu featuring dishes from the Italian region of Sicily.   I ordered the Spaghetti Mazara - Maine lobster, Mediterranean mussels, shrimp and tomato sauce served over spaghetti - need I say more? Our server even brought us dessert, compliments of the house!  Overall, a lovely evening and a wonderful way to celebrate the momentous occasion!
Wow. What a disappointment. I remember Il Fornaio as the quintessential California Italian dining experience. Outdoor dining, excellent service, and the smell of wood smoke always made the food taste better. This time, my waiter couldn't give me the time of day. He didn't have place settings on the table, got our order wrong, spoke fewer than 20 words the whole meal, and never asked if the food was good. The food was not good. Our salad, which wasn't what we ordered, was over-dressed and the pasta in the Capellini al Pomodoro was over-cooked. Finally, in a half-empty restaurant, they sat us right on top of another table. Not well done at all!
It's a nice-looking joint for sure, but I only considered it fantastic when I was in high school and didn't know any better. The food is all right, but not great value and not very sophisticated.  I'd prefer Osteria or, hell, even Pasta? for the value
Went there for dinner with visiting relatives -- very disappointed.  Every entree arrived cold.  None were particularly flavorful.  Waitress was nervous and forgetful.  Salt crusted fish was terrible.  If you have to go, try to sit in the front area by the kitchen.
All around good spot. Good food, nice wait staff, great atmosphere I always get the cappellachi di zucca(butternut squash ravioli)
I have been here for brunch and dinner.  Brumch is excellent.  Well wortht he price.  Dinner was a bit on the pricey side for food that seemed very typically italian.  It was nothing special.  The service on both occasions was excellent.
Nice ambience but food here is pretty underwhelming.  Had a few events here and everytime it has been just an ok experience.  Service is good though and i mean its in downtown PA.
2.5 Stars for restaurant and food (average) + 1.5 bonus stars for service Before I start......HOW THE HELL DO U PRONOUNCE THIS? i know it shouldn't be that hard, but for some reason, I can't get it to sound/feel right when I say it! My mom was in the neighborhood so she took me out to lunch.  I remember seeing this place on the weekly yelp (Yelp goes to Google), so I decided to go here. Bad start - Hair on table cloth and water stains on utensils Our server (Nicholas?) was great.  He brought us some bread and butter and also some olive oil/vinegar for my mom.  Good bread (I know my girl would really like it). My mom ordered the Insalata di Pollo dal Girarrosto w/ no bacon, and I ordered the Lasagna Ferrarese w/ Insalata del Fornaio.  When the food came out, I noticed that the meat looked a little different from "beef", so I asked our server.  He said he believes it's beef, but ran back a bit later to tell me there was actually pork in there also.  DAMN. It looked really good, but now I had to decide on something else.  It was either a pizza, or Cannelloni Al Fornol.  Even though I'd like to add to my yelp list on pizza, I went w/ the Canneloni. It was good too.  nothing special, but good.....best part was the spinach in there. My mom really liked her salad.  I didn't finish my food (trying to get into Hawaii shape for next month), but when I asked for it to be boxed up, he gave me some more bread and said "I noticed u liked the bread so I gave u some more". This place is nice, food is good, service was excellent.  I'll probably be back for a pizza someday just so I can add it to my list.
Went there tonight for my birthday dinner with my partner.  I ordered the Hahn Merlot which was delicious!  I got the peapod pasta with the ragu meat sauce and it was great!  My partner ordered the roasted chicken with seasonal vegetables and mash potatoes and it was nothing special.  Overall, I would definitely go there again for their in-house made pasta.
I've been studying the Verace Pizza Napoletana (VPN) standard lately in my own kitchen and in restaurants. The Margherita version at Il Fornaio is pretty good, but compared to Delfina and those that I've been able to reverse engineer, its main flaw is TOO MUCH SALT in the crust and cheese. The sauce is very good, but also just a bit too salty, thick, and lacking in the requisite deep, rich San Marzano tomato flavor. The crust was very good with a slightly toasty bottom but it lacked the puffy texture inside and bubbly and burnt spots in the crust on top. Overall pretty good and satisfying but it tastes and feels a bit to formulaic, manufactured, and cooked at  too low a temperature.
Service was nice and pasta was aldente which is kind of hard to find in the south bay. Pizza was not Italian but more American taste. That is minus point. Overall okay.
Our school does a unit on manners and for the second year in a row we have been able to practice what we have taught the children in  a secluded setting .Luigi Mavica from Il Fornaio and his staff  help us do this . They provide a menu . which is kid friendly and has a great variety for them to choose from. The staff are patient and very encouraging which makes the learning experience even more valuable. We are very thankful to Luigi for doing this Michele Barry Our School
What an awesome restaurant!  This is a corporate chain, but you do not get that feeling here.  We usually dine at Tamarine and Evvia but wanted to try something different.  The menu is decent but the food is really good!  We had the rare steak and the spinach and sausage ravioli for our main course.  Both were prepared perfectly and the taste was superb.  We split the beet salad and it was wonderful.  The wine list is prepared exceptionally well and priced right.  We treated ourselves to the "Choregrapy" by Fleming Jackson which was delicious.  Our server Jessie was on par and made the dining experience perfect.  With a $60 plus bottle of wine, salad and desert, our bill was around $125!  Cannot be beat.  We are looking forward to our next Il Fornaio dining experience and will recommend to our friends and family.  Well done!
I've had decent, simple pasta dishes here before, but this time I was in the mood to splurge and got the bistecca fiorentina for $36.  It was awful.  The first steak they served me (which I sent back)  was cooked medium-well instead of medium-rare, and the second, though cooked fine, was about as bland a piece of steak as I have ever tasted.  Fairly poor cut, zero seasoning, not even salt and pepper.  My sister had the salmon, which was overcooked. Long story short:  if you go, go for the nice patio and good ambiance, and stick to the simple pasta dishes that are under $20.  If you spend more you'll feel cheated - save the fancier dishes for an actual fancy restaurant.
We've been here a few times with our younger kids.  It's a great set up for kids with an area off to the side that still feels nice, but is away from the main dining room so you don't feel like your kids are bugging others when they behave like little simians.  The food is not great and not bad.  Just very steady.  Wine list decent.  Service solid.  Overall, a good, solid place.  Nothing exceptionally good or bad.
Standardbearer for Italian.
The dinning environment is great, I heard people calling it "deal for real" due to rumor saying lot of VC deals are done here. In fact, it's only partly true. Lot of family party may make it too noisy to discuss business deal, which is what I experienced. I believe the full course dinner maybe excellent, however I am not impressed with the pasta, in fact, it's not dilicious at all.
Oh man. The only reason I am giving Il Fornaio two stars is because I had a good experience the last time I went for a company event. This time I went to dinner after work with my friend and I swear we had the worst, most awkward waiter I have ever had in my life. He was attentive enough, but had absolutely no idea what the rules are of giving good service. It was kinda sad. I can't fault him for being rude...just totally clueless...but not in a cute way, a very very unfortunate way. After a meal of disastrous service, I overheard the following conversation between him and the poor unsuspecting couple behind us: 'Welcome! Have you been to Il Fornaio before?' 'Yes! But not this location...the one in Burlingame which we loved.' 'Yeah, well, I tried getting a job there but didn't get hired. I came here and they hired me on the spot!' Palo Alto Il Fornaio, you made a very poor choice in waitstaff. My pasta was pretty bad, too.
I go here a lot for a quick lunch or dinner with colleagues/friends. The food is pretty good (I veer towards the pizza & salads and away from the meat dishes, which I think they overdo a bit). The service is always professional and friendly. The ambiance is very nice and comfortable - airy, relaxed, but can be dressed up for a nice dinner if that's what you're doing. The back patio is one of my favorite places to eat in Palo Alto - very pleasant, with nice flowers and a fountain...makes you feel like you don't have to go back to work! Sometimes I also grab a quick meal at the bar or in the front patio, which is a relaxing place to chill as well. The olive bread is amazing (as are all their breads & pizzas in my opinion). And they have the best espresso maker in town.
Sweet Italian spot, go get your pizza at the bar, you won't be disappointed. By the way, THE AUTHENTIC ITALIAN CIABATTA BREAD IS HERE (and incredibly affordable).
I love the food here.  I'm Italian and this gets really close to the real thing!  The atmosphere is good with just enough bustling and the flower arrangements lift my soul...  All in all, I recommend this place to most of my friends!
Good but pricey and very busy.
My wife and I like the regional menus that Il Fornaio offers annually.  So far this year (2010) we have tried the two out of two and have enjoyed the meals very much.  We have lived in Italy and find many of the regional dishes to be quite good compared to what we found in Rome and other places.  Ok not everything is special but the regional meals are three course meals and usually at least two courses are very good.  On the weekend, the service can be a bit stretched so try and go on  a weekday.
Always "Molto Bene"...that is why I deceided to have a lunch for 20 there last week. Although they were busy...the service continued with attentiveness and grace. We sat in the patio which was warmed with heaters but airy. The custom menu I selected was a crowd pleaser with their traditional Ravioli, Salmon and Vegi Pasta and Tiramisu. Their wine list had reasonable choices of Italian/ Calif wines. The smell of the wood fired ovens, the Pizza and Breads baking  when you walk in is enough to remind you of your last trip to Italy. They made a Caponata relish appetizer for me (not on menu) that was tangy and sweet (as good as mine!) Eva the Events Director was a pleasure to work with. As always 5 Stars for Il Fornaio They have valet
Came for dinner during happy hour, lured by a big sign out front advertising $5 drinks. We sat at a table literally right across from the bar. When we ordered our food, I asked about the HH wine selection. Waiter snapped at me, "You can't order happy hour drinks at dinner. You can only get that in the bar." I was taken aback by the tone. So I have to go over there to the bar and order it there? "NO! You can't do that!" Why not? "Let me get the manager." Manager comes over: "You can't have a happy hour drink unless you're in the bar." And if I go order it in the bar? "Well, I guess you can do that, but you'll have to stay over there and drink it there; you can't bring it to your table." Okay, that's your policy; fine. I really was just asking. (The wines by the glass ranging from 9 to 16 dollars weren't calling to me.) Forget that the bar area was literally five feet away from where I was sitting. Whatever. It was the attitude that grated. Total lack of graciousness. I used to come here a lot with my kids. Not any more. Life's too short--and the restaurant business too competitive--to go somewhere only to be treated rudely.
I'm usaully a fan of Il Fornaio in Palo Alto; however, we had a very "tacky" experience recently.  We ordered the butternut squash ravioli, which consisted of (5) five ravioli.  We each had one, and after one or two bites, we both realized that the ravioli was very COLD.  We spoke to the waiter, she informed us that she would speak to the chef, and promply returned with (3) re-heated ravioli.  Ummm, what about the two that were half eaten??  The ravioli were cold...,that wasn't our fault.  When we spoke to the manager at the end of our meal, she said in a BOOMING VOICE which the entire restuarant heard.... I'M SORRY, WE'LL ONLY CHARGE YOU FOR THE 3 RAVIOLI.   Tacky Tacky...where's the customer service Il Fornaio, and what about having a little chat with your Manager on proper etiquette!!!
Easily the worst Il Fornaio there is.  Our waiter actually lied to us the last time we were in - said they had no meat sauce for the night and then the manager brought us some, the staff is so cocky it is silly.  Eggs are never cooked properly at breakfast, kids sauce is super spicy, bruschetta was gross - they used beefsteak tomatoes!, portions are inconsistent...Any other one is better, don't waste your time at this one.
I have been going there for years and it seems like the food is becoming more neutral in taste and just bland in some cases. It's nothing special anymore. Last night, a table of six couldn't even get water served to the table . The 3rd time I asked, I made myself very clear that I wanted water now and the server was just not interested. The server did not know the wines very well, perhaps a newbie. Apps were just so average, Lasagna was just average, service was less than average, it was incredibly noisy when they were moving some metal partition around...we couldn't even talk for those 5 minutes. If it were up to me, I would give them a wide berth for a year or two to get their chef's some time to re-learn their craft.
It is kind of up and down for me on this one. Hit or miss. sometimes i am really pleased with my meal sometimes not. Also, sometimes I get excited to order something and find out they are out.  That really makes me made.  I wish they would let me know what they are out of before I read the menu. But the atmosphere is nice so I enjoy going there.
Il Fornaio is a fantastic place for a hearty, family-style Italian meal. The room is warm and inviting, and the staff always make customers feel like family. Service can be slow, however, especially during staff shift-changes. The food is always excellent. The wood-fired pizzas and roast chicken are particular favorites, and I love watching the desert cart go by.
Bar none the best Italian place in town with absolutely reasonable prices and a charming atmosphere.  We had a shower for a friend there and used a party room in the back.....they did a great job.  I also find here a sort of old-world charm what with all the regulars and long-term staff.  And I like hearing Italian from time to time among the customers, and love the capellacci di zucca, beet and spinich salads, polenta-goulash, and sadly, all of the desserts.
Home sweet home.  - great pizza, great free snacks at the bar at happy hour.  Best Bartender - Alexi....makes everyone happy.  I don't normally like chains...but this doesn't feel (or taste) like a chain at all.  The is a great single person's restaurant.....you can eat at the bar and feel very comfortable...and even make friends....its the Cheers of Palo Alto.  Its a great restaurant - great food, but not expensive, great wait staff, changing menu - so always new creative foods - while nice...still okay to bring kids.  Its my default restaurant....
This restaurant is always crowded, due to its good service and delicious food. The menu is broad enough to accommodate just about anyone. My favorites include the light and tasty Pizza Margherita and the excellent Insalata del Fornaio, which may just be the best salad I've ever tasted.
Great atmosphere and most specially great service. Our waiter was very knowledgeable and helpful. I had the bolognese pasta and it was up to expectations. I have tasted my friend's lasagna and it was very good, the combiantion of the creamy sauce and the ricotta cheese at the right temperatures melt away in your mouth. not a big fan of the minestrone soup, no taste. and to top it all, their raspberry chocolarte mousse (maybe different name on menu) is a little short of divine.... That is my second time there and i would definitely go there again.
Interior 4, location 4, taste 3.5, health 2.5, service 3.75
I have never had poor service here. It hasn't mattered whether I am alone, as I often am, or with a group.  David W. is friendly, attentive, knowledgeable about the menu and even remembers what wine our party likes.  A friendly enjoyable atmosphere and good food.  The regional dinners in the first two weeks of the month are great for sampling dishes from the various regions of Italy.  I haven't disliked any of the special offerings I have tried.
Never had a good meal here.  The food hasn't been horrible, but I grimace everytime my boss suggests going to Il Fornaio.  Happy hour is good - pizza is prettty good, and the prices make a good value.  For a proper meal, though, try someplace else.
We hired Il Fornail to cater our annual reception party. Glad we did. They laid out a nice looking buffet with two vegetable salads, vege dishes and fish & chicken entres. All very good and presented well. They even brought extra servers durning the greeting hour for the appetizers. Love Il Fornaio bread and deserts - kind of rich in taste. The Il Flornaio crew cleaned up well and allowed for us to dance and party uninterrupted.
My husband and our friends, another couple decided to meet here for dinner.  My husband and I had such a wonderful experience at the Il Fornaio in Carmel so we assumed we would get the same excellent service.  We were completely wrong!  First off I'm 9 1/2 months pregnant and where do they seat us?  They seat us in the outside patio section (beginning of February).  Ok, they do have a lot of heat lamps on, but it's pretty cold out here in February.  Plus we had just had a bunch of rain so there was dripping from the over hang continuously going on just 6 inches from the back of my husbands chair (when he went to get up or back out of his chair he would get dripped on).  But ok, I guess if you are still considering going request to be seated inside if it's the middle of winter.  Who knew you had to request such things? But the worst part of the evening was the horrible service we received.  Like I said before, we had such a good experience in Carmel we were completely taken aback by the lack of caring.  Our waiter couldn't remember what we ordered.  We had to ask for everything, cheese, more water, more wine, dessert menus, steak knife, salt and pepper.  My poor friend was stuck for 10 minutes trying to flag someone down for a steak knife.  2 out of four of our entrees were cold.  We couldn't figure out if our waiter had it in for us or if he was just really bad.  He seemed to check on the other tables around us, but purposely ignored our table.  I made eye contact with him several times that he registered, but he still would not come to our table side to check on what we needed.  I literally had to wave my napkin up and down to get a refill for my husband on his coffee. Needless to say we will not be coming back to this location.  We might try the one in San Jose, but never again in Palo Alto.  Not worth the frustration, when you are just trying to relax and have a nice dinner with friends.
An exhausting dining experience. Our initial order was taken down wrong. Half our party received their meal and we had to wait for the other meals to be fixed. One of the dishes tasted like it had been nuked in a microwave. Service was really slow and at one point, they forgot to bring us the bill..... I can see not bringing the food but the bill??
Went for dinner on a Th evening with a girlfriend.  We were seated promptly with our reservation and the bread was there right away and was pretty good.  My wine took a while to come out and it was not the most generous glass as previously mentioned.  But the food was good and the service as well otherwise.  We shared the caprese salad which was awesome.  I got the veggie pizza and my friend the risotto, we were both really pleased.  Like the environment and would like to return.
I have lived in Palo Alto for 5 years, and as a Stanford student / Investment Banker in the area I have had to suffer through more than my fair share of power lunching, ass-kissing events at Il Fornaio.  It is probably the most famous spot in Palo Alto-- every CEO I have ever spoken with brings it up.  BUT WHY?? IT IS SO BAD.  I have NEVER had even an OK meal there-- I suppose to placate everyone they serve their food completely unseasoned and uninspired-- the highlight of most of my lunches and dinners there has been the pellegrino with a lime.  That was a freaking alaine ducasse masterpiece compared to the rest of the slop they serve up-- I am pretty sure that "Il Fornaio" is italian for "The Old Spaghetti Factory."  Only a Puritan would get some kind of self-flaggelating pleasure from eating at Il Fornaio-- that being said, I will probably be refuted by someone who likes it, but keep in mind that the clientele is as bland as the food.  One positive: If you want to watch people squirm as they go through their final interviews over lunch there, or hear desperate startups pitch their souls to Jim Breyer, Il Fornaio can't be beat.
Love coming here for their happy hour. Can't beat their 5 dollar pizzas and appetizers. Can't really comment on anything else because I haven't come here at hours besides the happy hour.
I love the ambiance and atmosphere of this place! That's my favorite part! It's quiet and cozy without being stuffy. I also like how it's a casual nice place--that means there will be no grubby stinky patrons there. This place is too nice for bad people but not too nice for it to be bad! I can go there, dress it up a notch without being all fancy, and enjoy a delicious meal at a reasonable price. Their food is absolutely amazing--they import their past and flour from Italy. Their bread is yum yum in my tum tum, and their servers are attentive. The manager goes around making sure everyone is having a good time. I ordered a mango martini once and it was a bit strong for my taste. But other than that, I only have great things to say about this place!
a chain restaurant and almost all of them ive tried has a great ambience but i am no t impressed with their service and food at this particular location!!! Burlingame and Walnut creek is better
I have been to many of the il fornaio restaurants throughout LA and I must say that my experience at this location was very disappointing!  My husband booked reservations for us because we were going out the Friday after Valentine's Day.  Despite having reservations, we got terrible seats on the outside panel crammed by a fountain that splashed on us and under a broken heater.  When I complained about our seats they said there were no alternatives.  That was strike #1. Then the waitress confused my order and gave me sausage ravioli instead of Butternut squash (i dont eat meat).  After a few bites, I grabbed someone's attention and they told me they would get the waitress.  We waited for over 20 minutes as our waitress attending to all of the other guests except us.  When she finally came over and we explained the situation, she was not apologetic and was quite rude. I was really disappointed as I have always been a fan of Il Fornaio.  This place is mediocre, at best.
My sister took me to lunch here today and boy were we impressed with the service.  First we are two dressed down women in a sea of power suits.  Usually you would tend to get the cold shoulder, but this was definitely not the case.  We chatted a bit before ordering minestrone and the spinach and bacon salads.  Water and tea were refilled quickly and very delicious bread was set on the table.  The minestrone and the salad were both good, very acceptable menu items.  But  then the busser brought over a chocolate mousse, I asked my sister and she said that she had not mentioned it was my birthday, so we figured it was a mistake.  A minute later our waiter was back with the mousse with a candle in it.  We gave him a blank stare when he said it was for my birthday.  We asked how he knew and he replied that he had seen me opening a gift.  WOW..how observant and what a professional.  Carlos, our waiter is a credit to his profession and to Il Fornaio and lucky for him, we have both worked in the restaurant biz ourselves.  Great Job.
suprised to see such low ratings for this place. i thought the food and ambiance was really nice. we had the pizzas which were super good, and some fancy salads which were also very good. the next time we went we had one of the pastas which was quite pricey but quite good as well. in addition, they give you a lot of bread with olive oil and vinegar, and the bread is freshly baked and comes hot/warm. i would agree that the service sucks though. our waitress was never around, plus she sounded like minnie mouse. it was quite scary/creepy/funny all at the same time.
they don't have a very large bar area but it's a nice place for a casual business cocktail and snack, it's not too fancy or loud.
Hey, it's the Olive Garden for the Palo Alto crowd. Uninspired, bland, overpriced.
The food is pretty decent, but there's something a little off.  The service can be uneven and you have to order carefully to avoid being disappointed.  That being said, the cioppino was good, but mostly liquid and not enough seafood.  My girlfriend's calzone was huge and quite tasty.
If you are really looking for a great authentic Italian place, try A Bellagio in Campbell. You won't regret! Cheaper and WAY BETTER!
Three stars only because the service was very good, it's a pretty spot, and you can hear your friends talking. This is partly because it's not crowded -- on a Thursday night, I was surprised -- until I ate my dinner. Dried out halibut, bland red pepper sauce, tasteless roasted potatoes, and undercooked spinach -- I shouldn't need a knife to cut it. I generally think that food is oversalted, but I had to add salt, pepper, and lemon juice to make this at all enjoyable. I've eaten good meals here in the past, but if this is what IF has become, no wonder it wasn't crowded. So for the food, one star.
HANDS DOWN the best italian restaurant in the bay area--esp. in PA---the staff is very pleasant, the food fabulous, and the prices good...its great to sit at the counter and watch them cook...this has become our most favorite restaurant and in a  city that has become so damned crowded, more and more unpleasant, and demanding, the restaurant hasn't changed in decades and it's a nice spot to eat because the staff are amazingly nice and fun to be around--they even remember my wife and i when we come it...a rarity. However, we're leaving the area for a new spot on east coast which will be a welcome change--and they have a great italian (and french etc..) restaurant.
service was slow and the menu wasn't too impressive. i also think it was expensive. probably wont go back .
I had dinner tonight with my physically impaired friend who suffers from muscular dystrophy and my daughter, my friend is able to walk very slowly with a cain but unable to lift himself up without help. After a wonderful dinner I asked two men (waiters I assume) for help and they tried for about a minute and left my friend saying that they had to tend to a banquet, c'mon, are you shiiting me? It was almost 10 p.m., almost closing time. They left my disabled friend feeling mortified!!!! There was a woman, seemed she was the manager just staring at the situation, WTF!!! She didn't know how to manage the situation I guess, she should work at a damn DMV. Those men returned after 10 minutes to help, I hated them, I wanted to punched them out but they were taller then me dammit!!! Please don't go to this restaurant, they have no respect for disabled people, I will never ever again patronize Il fornio, I hate these people who have no compassion, just ignorance.
